Nebraska, session 109, LB647.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act is to serve a public
purpose by:
(1) Promoting public health and wellness through access to recreational
trails;
(2) Encouraging economic development and tourism by expanding regional and
state trail systems;
(3) Supporting environmental conservation by protecting and maintaining
open spaces for recreational use; and
(4) Enhancing connectivity between communities, cultural landmarks, and
natural resources to provide equitable access for all Nebraskans.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax
Exemption Act:
(1) Eligible holder means:
(a) A municipality, county, agency, or a land trust accredited by the Land
Trust Alliance authorized to hold recreational trail easements within the State
of Nebraska; or
(b) A nonprofit organization with a mission explicitly aligned with public
access, recreational land conservation, and community benefit, authorized to
hold recreational trail easements within the State of Nebraska; and
(2) Recreational trail easement means a perpetual easement granting public
access for recreational use, including, but not limited to, walking, hiking,
bicycling, and equestrian activities.
Sec. 4. (1) A taxpayer who encumbers their property with a perpetual
recreational trail easement may apply for a property tax exemption for the
portion of the property which has been encumbered with the easement as provided
in section 77-202.01. The forms for such applications shall be prescribed as
provided in section 77-202.05.
(2) Upon approval of the application for the exemption, the portion of the
property encumbered with a perpetual recreational trail easement shall remain
exempt from property taxes without requiring reapplication for the exemption
until the property is no longer encumbered with a perpetual recreational trail
easement.
Sec. 5. To qualify for the property tax exemption, the easement shall:
(1) Be perpetual and recorded with the appropriate county register of
deeds;
(2) Provide public access and connect to existing or planned regional
-1-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
trails or significant local attractions, such as parks, waterways, cultural
sites, or residential areas; and
(3) Be held by an eligible holder, including nonprofit organizations that
demonstrate:
(a) A primary mission of promoting public access, health, and wellness
through recreational land use;
(b) A commitment to environmental conservation and land stewardship; and
(c) Capacity to oversee and manage trail easements independently or
through partnerships with accredited entities, ensuring compliance with public
access goals.
Sec. 6. The Department of Revenue shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax
Exemption Act. Such rules and regulations shall include:
(1) Clear guidelines for nonprofit organizations to demonstrate their
eligibility as holders of recreational trail easements, ensuring alignment with
public access and conservation goals;
(2) Procedures for certifying the public benefit of qualifying easements,
including requirements for connectivity to existing or planned trail systems;
and
(3) Methods for ensuring compliance with the public purpose outlined in
the act.
Sec. 7. Sections 7 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Adoption Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 8. (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there
shall be allowed a credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 for any taxpayer that is eligible for the federal adoption
expenses tax credit provided in 26 U.S.C. 23.
(2) The credit shall be a refundable credit equal to ten percent of the
federal tax credit allowed to the taxpayer under 26 U.S.C. 23 in the same
taxable year.
Sec. 9. The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Adoption Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 10. Section 13-518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-518 For purposes of sections 13-518 to 13-522:
(1) Allowable growth means (a) for governmental units other than community
colleges, the percentage increase in taxable valuation in excess of the base
limitation established under section 77-3446, if any, due to (i) improvements
to real property as a result of new construction and , additions to existing
buildings, (ii) any other improvements to real property which increase the
value of such property, (iii) and any increase in valuation due to annexation
of real property by the governmental unit, (iv) a change in the use of real
property, (v) and any increase in personal property valuation over the prior
year, and (vi) the accumulated excess valuation over the redevelopment project
valuation described in section 18-2147 of the Community Development Law for
redevelopment projects within the governmental unit in the year immediately
after the division of taxes for such redevelopment project has ended and (b)
for community colleges, the percentage increase in excess of the base
limitation, if any, in full-time equivalent students from the second year to
the first year preceding the year for which the budget is being determined;
(2) Capital improvements means (a) acquisition of real property or (b)
acquisition, construction, or extension of any improvements on real property;
(3) Governing body has the same meaning as in section 13-503, except that
for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, such term shall not
include the governing body of any county, city, or village;
(4) Governmental unit means every political subdivision which has
authority to levy a property tax or authority to request levy authority under
section 77-3443, except that such term shall not include (a) sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for five years or less, (b)
school districts, or (c) for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025,
counties, cities, or villages;
(5) Qualified sinking fund means a fund or funds maintained separately
from the general fund to pay for acquisition or replacement of tangible
personal property with a useful life of five years or more which is to be
undertaken in the future but is to be paid for in part or in total in advance
using periodic payments into the fund. The term includes sinking funds under
subdivision (13) of section 35-508 for firefighting and rescue equipment or
apparatus;
(6) Restricted funds means (a) property tax, excluding any amounts
refunded to taxpayers, (b) payments in lieu of property taxes, (c) local option
sales taxes, (d) motor vehicle taxes, (e) state aid, (f) transfers of surpluses
from any user fee, permit fee, or regulatory fee if the fee surplus is
transferred to fund a service or function not directly related to the fee and
the costs of the activity funded from the fee, (g) any funds excluded from
restricted funds for the prior year because they were budgeted for capital
improvements but which were not spent and are not expected to be spent for
capital improvements, (h) the tax provided in sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227
beginning in the second fiscal year in which the county will receive a full
year of receipts, and (i) any excess tax collections returned to the county
under section 77-1776. Funds received pursuant to the nameplate capacity tax
levied under section 77-6203 for the first five years after a renewable energy
generation facility has been commissioned are nonrestricted funds; and
-2-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
(7) State aid means:
(a) For all governmental units, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section 77-1239;
(b) For municipalities, state aid to municipalities paid pursuant to
sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance premium
tax paid to municipalities;
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections 60-3,184
to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and reimbursements to
counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section 29-3933;
(d) For community colleges, state aid to community colleges paid pursuant
to the Community College Aid Act;
(e) For educational service units, state aid appropriated under sections
79-1241.01 and 79-1241.03; and
(f) For local public health departments as defined in section 71-1626,
state aid as distributed under section 71-1628.08.
Sec. 11. Section 13-3103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3103 (1) Any applicant may apply to the board for state assistance if
(a) the applicant has acquired, constructed, improved, or equipped an eligible
sports arena facility, (b) the applicant has approved a revenue bond issue or a
general obligation bond issue to acquire, construct, improve, or equip an
eligible sports arena facility, (c) the applicant has adopted a resolution
authorizing the applicant to pursue a general obligation bond issue to acquire,
construct, improve, or equip an eligible sports arena facility, (d) a building
permit has been issued within the applicant's jurisdiction for an eligible
sports arena facility that is a privately owned concert venue, or (e) a
building permit has been issued or construction has been completed within the
applicant's jurisdiction for an eligible sports arena facility that is a
privately owned sports complex, or (f) each coapplicant described in
subdivision (1)(b) of section 13-3102 has adopted a resolution authorizing
either the political subdivision or the nonprofit corporation to pursue
financing or bonds to acquire, construct, improve, or equip an eligible sports
arena facility for the purposes set forth in subdivision (4)(b) of section
13-3103.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the
state assistance shall only be used by the applicant to pay back amounts
expended or borrowed through one or more issues of bonds to be expended by the
applicant to acquire, construct, improve, or equip the publicly owned eligible
sports arena facility and to acquire, construct, improve, or equip publicly
owned nearby parking facilities.
(3) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned
concert venue, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant (a) to
pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues of bonds to be
expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve, or equip a nearby
parking facility or (b) to promote arts and cultural events which are open to
or made available to the general public.
(4) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned sports
complex, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant:
(a) To to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues
of bonds to be expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve, or
equip one or more public infrastructure projects, as defined in section
77-27,142, related to a privately owned sports complex; ,
(b) To to lease all or a portion of such privately owned sports complex
for the governmental use of the political subdivision. For purposes of this
subdivision, lease means any contractual lease agreement between the
coapplicants described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 13-3102 for the use of
an eligible sports arena facility at fair market rental value for a term not to
exceed twenty years; ,
(c) To to promote sporting events which are open to or made available to
the general public; , or
(d) To to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more debt
issues to be expended by the nonprofit corporation coapplicant to acquire,
construct, improve, or equip a privately owned sports complex, subject to voter
approval as provided in section 13-3110.
(5)(a) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of the arts and
cultural events shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant to section
13-3108.
(b) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of sporting events
shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant to section 13-3108.
(c) No more than five years of funding for a sports complex located in a
city of the second class or village shall be paid by state assistance received
pursuant to section 13-3108.
(6) For any application for state assistance for a large public stadium
approved on or after July 19, 2024, up to one hundred percent of the final cost
of the project may be funded by state assistance received pursuant to section
13-3108.
Sec. 12. Section 13-3106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-3106 (1) After consideration of the application and the evidence, if
the board finds that the project described in the application is eligible and
that state assistance is in the best interest of the state, the application
shall be approved, except that:
(a) An an approval of an application submitted because of the requirement
-3-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
in subdivision (1)(c) of section 13-3103 is a temporary approval. If the
general obligation bond issue is subsequently approved by the voters of the
political subdivision, the approval by the board becomes permanent. If the
general obligation bond issue is not approved by such voters, the temporary
approval shall become void; and .
(b) An approval of an application submitted because of the requirement in
subdivision (1)(f) of section 13-3103 is a temporary approval. If a building
permit for the eligible sports arena facility is issued within twenty-four
months of the temporary approval, the approval by the board becomes permanent.
If a building permit is not issued within twenty-four months of the temporary
approval, the temporary approval shall become void.
(2) In determining whether state assistance is in the best interest of the
state, the board shall consider the fiscal and economic capacity of the
applicant to finance the local share of the project.
(3) A majority of the board members constitutes a quorum for the purpose
of conducting business. All actions of the board shall be by a majority vote of
all the board members, one of whom must be the Governor.
Sec. 13. Section 13-3402, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3402 For purposes of the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act:
(1) Approved bonds means bonds as defined in subdivision (1) of section
10-134 that are approved according to law, excluding any bonds issued to
finance a project or projects if the issuance of bonds for such project or
projects was the subject of a general obligation bond election held at the most
recent regularly scheduled election and was not approved at such election;
(2) Auditor means the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(3) Emergency means an emergency, as defined in section 81-829.39, for
which a state of emergency proclamation or local state of emergency
proclamation has been issued under the Emergency Management Act;
(4) Growth percentage means the percentage obtained by dividing (a) the
political subdivision's growth value by (b) the political subdivision's total
property valuation from the prior year;
(5) Growth value means the increase in a political subdivision's total
property valuation from the prior year to the current year due to (a)
improvements to real property as a result of new construction and additions to
existing buildings, (b) any other improvements to real property which increase
the value of such property, (c) annexation of real property by the political
subdivision, (d) a change in the use of real property, (e) any increase in
personal property valuation over the prior year, and (f) the accumulated
increase in excess valuation over the redevelopment project valuation described
in section 18-2147 of the Community Development Law for redevelopment projects
within the political subdivision in the year immediately after the division of
taxes for such redevelopment project has ended , provided the accumulated
excess valuation which exists as of July 1, 2025, shall be included in the
calculation of the increase in excess valuation for the political subdivision's
first fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025;
(6) Inflation percentage means the annual percentage change in the State
and Local Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment for the twelve-month
period ending on December 31 of the prior year, as reported by March 31 of the
current year by the United States Bureau of Economic Analysis for December of
the prior calendar year for the preceding twelve-month period;
(7) Political subdivision means any county, city, or village;
(8) Property tax request means the total amount of property taxes
requested to be raised for a political subdivision through the levy imposed
pursuant to section 77-1601;
(9) Property tax request authority means the amount that may be included
in a political subdivision's property tax request as determined pursuant to the
Property Tax Growth Limitation Act; and
(10) State aid means:
(a) For all political subdivisions, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section 77-1239;
(b) For cities and villages, state aid to cities and villages paid
pursuant to sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and
insurance premium tax paid to cities and villages; and
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections 60-3,184
to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and reimbursements to
counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section 29-3933.
Sec. 14. Section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3403 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, a
political subdivision's property tax request for any year shall not exceed its
property tax request authority as determined under this section. The
preliminary property tax request authority for each political subdivision shall
be the amount of property taxes requested and approved by each levied by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601 for such political
subdivision and included on the budget document filed with the auditor in the
prior fiscal year pursuant to subsection (2) of section 13-506, less the sum of
exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (7) of
section 13-3404.
(2) In addition to the preliminary property tax request authority, the
political subdivision's property tax request authority may be increased by the
product of:
-4-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
(a) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the prior
year increased by the political subdivision's growth percentage, less the sum
of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2)
of section 13-3404, and (ii) the political subdivision's growth percentage; and
(b) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the prior
year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to
subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404, and (ii) the greater of zero or
the inflation percentage.
Sec. 15. Section 13-3405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3405 (1) A political subdivision may increase its property tax request
authority over the amount determined under section 13-3403 if such increase is
approved by a majority of legal voters voting on the issue at an election
described in subsection (2) of this section. Such issue shall be placed on the
ballot (a) upon the recommendation of the governing body of such political
subdivision or (b) upon the receipt by the county clerk or election
commissioner of a petition requesting such issue to be placed on the ballot
which is signed by at least five percent of the legal voters of the political
subdivision. The recommendation of the governing body or the petition of the
legal voters shall include the amount by which the political subdivision would
increase its property tax request authority over and above the amount
determined under section 13-3403.
(2) Upon receipt of such recommendation or legal voter petition, the
county clerk or election commissioner shall place such issue on the ballot at
the next regularly scheduled election or a special election called for such
purpose and held on the first Tuesday after the second Monday in May of an odd-
numbered year. The election shall be held pursuant to the Election Act, and all
costs shall be paid by the political subdivision. The issue may be approved on
the same question as a vote to exceed the levy limits provided in section
77-3444. If a majority of the votes cast on the issue are in favor of
increasing the political subdivision's property tax request authority, the
political subdivision shall be empowered to do so.
Sec. 16. Section 13-3406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3406 (1) A political subdivision may choose not to increase its total
property taxes levied by the full amount of the property tax request authority
allowed in a particular year. In such cases, the political subdivision may
carry forward to future budget years the amount of unused property tax request
authority, but accumulation of unused property tax request authority shall not
exceed an aggregate of five percent of the total property tax request authority
from the prior year.
(2) A political subdivision may choose to convert its accumulated amount
of unused restricted funds authority existing on June 30, 2025, as determined
in accordance with section 13-521, into unused property tax request authority.
The amount converted may then be used by the political subdivision as unused
property tax request authority for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
2025. The amount converted shall not exceed five percent of the total property
taxes levied for the political subdivision in calendar year 2024.
Sec. 17. Section 14-109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
14-109 (1)(a) The city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall
have power to tax for revenue, license, and regulate any person within the
limits of the city by ordinance except as otherwise provided in this section.
Such tax may include both a tax for revenue and license. The city council may
raise revenue by levying and collecting a tax on any occupation or business
within the limits of the city. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax imposed
pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable classification of businesses,
users of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing such tax,
except that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is
subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145,
66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section
77-2704.24. The occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in
section 18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation
tax subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures and
entertainments shall be exempt from taxation, as well as concerts and all other
musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the city. It shall
be the duty of the city clerk to deliver to the city treasurer a copy of the
ordinance levying such tax.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, limits of the city does not include
the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such city.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection,
the city council shall also have the power to require any individual whose
primary residence or person who owns a place of business which is within the
limits of the city and that owns and operates a motor vehicle within such
limits to annually register such motor vehicle in such manner as may be
provided and to require such person to pay an annual motor vehicle fee therefor
and to require the payment of such fee upon the change of ownership of such
vehicle. All such fees which may be provided for under this subsection shall be
credited to a separate fund of the city, thereby created, to be used
exclusively for constructing, repairing, maintaining, or improving streets,
roads, alleys, public ways, or parts of such streets, roads, alleys, or ways or
for the amortization of bonded indebtedness when created for such purposes.
-5-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
(b) No motor vehicle fee shall be required under this subsection if (i) a
vehicle is used or stored but temporarily in such city for a period of six
months or less in a twelve-month period, (ii) an individual does not have a
primary residence or a person does not own a place of business within the
limits of the city and does not own and operate a motor vehicle within the
limits of the city, or (iii) an individual is a full-time student attending a
postsecondary institution within the limits of the city and the motor vehicle's
situs under the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act is different from the
place at which he or she is attending such institution.
(c) After December 31, 2012, no motor vehicle fee shall be required of any
individual whose primary residence is within the extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction of such city or any person who owns a place of business within
such jurisdiction.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, limits of the city includes the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such city.
(3) For purposes of this section, person includes bodies corporate,
societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships,
limited liability companies, joint-stock companies, cooperatives, and
associations. Person does not include any federal, state, or local government
or any political subdivision thereof.
Sec. 18. Section 15-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
15-202 A city of the primary class shall have the power to levy taxes for
general revenue purposes on all property within the corporate limits of the
city taxable according to the laws of Nebraska and to levy an occupation tax on
public service property or corporations in such amounts as may be proper and
necessary, in the judgment of the mayor and city council, for purposes of
revenue. All such taxes shall be uniform with respect to the class upon which
they are imposed. The occupation tax may be based upon a certain percentage of
the gross receipts of such public service corporation or upon such other basis
as may be determined upon by the mayor and city council. After March 27, 2014,
any occupation tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable
classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of transactions for
purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation tax shall be imposed
on any transaction which is subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489,
66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt
from tax under section 77-2704.24. The occupation tax shall be imposed in the
manner provided in section 18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply
to an occupation tax subject to section 86-704.
Sec. 19. Section 15-203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
15-203 A city of the primary class shall have power to raise revenue by
levying and collecting a license or occupation tax on any person, partnership,
limited liability company, corporation, or business within the limits of the
city and regulate the same by ordinance except as otherwise provided in this
section and in section 15-212. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax imposed
pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable classification of businesses,
users of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing such tax,
except that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is
subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145,
66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section
77-2704.24. The occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in
section 18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation
tax subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures and
entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation as well as concerts and all
other musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the city.
Sec. 20. Section 16-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-205 A city of the first class may raise revenue by levying and
collecting a license or occupation tax on any person, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, or business within the limits of the city and
may regulate the same by ordinance. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax
imposed pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable classification of
businesses, users of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing
such tax, except that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction
which is subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140,
66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under
section 77-2704.24. The occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided
in section 18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation
tax subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures and
entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation as well as concerts and all
other musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the city.
Sec. 21. Section 17-525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
17-525 Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to raise
revenue by levying and collecting a license tax on any occupation or business
within the limits of the city or village and regulate such occupation or
business by ordinance. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax imposed
pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable classification of businesses,
users of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing such tax,
except that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is
-6-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145,
66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section
77-2704.24. The occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in
section 18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation
tax subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the classes upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures
and entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation, as well as concerts and
other musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the city or
village.
Sec. 22. Section 18-1208, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
18-1208 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, after July 19,
2012, a municipality may impose a new occupation tax or increase the rate of an
existing occupation tax, which new occupation tax or increased rate of an
existing occupation tax is projected to generate annual occupation tax revenue
in excess of the applicable amount listed in subsection (2) of this section,
pursuant to section 14-109, 15-202, 15-203, 16-205, or 17-525 if the question
of whether to impose the tax or increase the rate of an existing occupation tax
has been submitted at an election held within the municipality and in which all
registered voters shall be entitled to vote on the question. The officials of
the municipality shall order the submission of the question by submitting a
certified copy of the resolution proposing the tax or tax rate increase to the
election commissioner or county clerk at least fifty days before the election.
The election shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act. If a
majority of the votes cast upon the question are in favor of the new tax or
increased rate of an existing occupation tax, then the governing body of such
municipality shall be empowered to impose the new tax or to impose the
increased tax rate. If a majority of those voting on the question are opposed
to the new tax or increased rate, then the governing body of the municipality
shall not impose the new tax or increased rate but shall maintain any existing
occupation tax at its current rate.
(2) The applicable amount of annual revenue for each new occupation tax or
annual revenue raised by the increased rate for an existing occupation tax for
purposes of subsection (1) of this section is:
(a) For cities of the metropolitan class, six million dollars;
(b) For cities of the primary class, three million dollars;
(c) For cities of the first class, seven hundred thousand dollars; and
(d) For cities of the second class and villages, three hundred thousand
dollars.
(3) After July 19, 2012, a municipality shall not be required to submit
the following questions to the registered voters:
(a) Whether to change the rate of an occupation tax imposed for a specific
project which does not provide for deposit of the tax proceeds in the
municipality's general fund; or
(b) Whether to terminate an occupation tax earlier than the determinable
termination date under the original question submitted to the registered
voters.
This subsection applies to occupation taxes imposed prior to, on, or after
July 19, 2012.
(4) This section shall not apply to (a) an occupation tax subject to
section 86-704 or (b) a municipality imposing an occupation tax within that
portion of a good life district established pursuant to the Good Life
Transformational Projects Act which is located within the corporate limits of
such municipality if the good life district applicant has approved of the
occupation tax. The changes made in this subdivision by Laws 2024, LB1317,
shall not be construed to invalidate an occupation tax imposed prior to April
24, 2024.
(5) No later than ninety days after the end of the fiscal year, each
municipality that imposes a new occupation tax or increases the rate of an
existing any occupation tax on or after the operative date of this section as
provided under this section shall provide an annual report on the collection
and use of such occupation tax. The report shall be posted on the
municipality's public website or made available for public inspection at a
location designated by the municipality. The report shall include, but not be
limited to:
(1) (a) A list of all such occupation taxes collected by the municipality;
(2) (b) The amount generated annually by each such occupation tax;
(3) (c) Whether funds generated by each such occupation tax are deposited
in the general fund, cash funds, or other funds of the municipality;
(4) (d) Whether any such occupation tax is dedicated for a specific
purpose, and if so, the amount dedicated for such purpose; and
(5) (e) The scheduled or projected termination date, if any, of each such
occupation tax.
Sec. 23. Section 68-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-1201 (1) In determining eligibility for the program for aid to
dependent children pursuant to section 43-512 as administered by the State of
Nebraska pursuant to the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
program, 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq., for the low-income home energy assistance
program administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to the federal Energy
Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 8621 to 8630, for the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to the
federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq., and for the
-7-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
child care subsidy program established pursuant to section 68-1202, the
following shall not be included in determining assets or income:
(a) Assets in or income from an educational savings account, a Coverdell
educational savings account described in 26 U.S.C. 530, a qualified tuition
program established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 529, or any similar savings account
or plan established to save for qualified higher education expenses as defined
in section 41 of this act 85-1802;
(b) Income from scholarships or grants related to postsecondary education,
whether merit-based, need-based, or a combination thereof;
(c) Income from postsecondary educational work-study programs, whether
federally funded, funded by a postsecondary educational institution, or funded
from any other source;
(d) Assets in or income from an account under a qualified program as
provided in section 77-1402;
(e) Income received for participation in grant-funded research on the
impact that income has on the development of children in low-income families,
except that such exclusion of income must not exceed four thousand dollars per
year for a maximum of eight years and such exclusion shall only be made if the
exclusion is permissible under federal law for each program referenced in this
section. No such exclusion shall be made for such income on or after December
31, 2026; and
(f) Income from any tax credits received pursuant to the School Readiness
Tax Credit Act.
(2) In determining eligibility for the program for aid to dependent
children pursuant to section 43-512 as administered by the State of Nebraska
pursuant to the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, 42
U.S.C. 601 et seq., passed-through child support as described in section
43-512.07, shall not be included in determining assets or income.
Sec. 24. Section 72-1239.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
72-1239.01 (1)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have the
responsibility for the investment management of the assets of the retirement
systems administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board as provided in
section 84-1503, the assets of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as
provided in section 45 of this act created pursuant to sections 85-1801 to
85-1817, the assets of the achieving a better life experience program pursuant
to sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, and beginning January 1, 2017, the assets of
each retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
appointed members shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to the investment of
the assets of the retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust, and of the achieving a better life experience program and shall be held
to the standard of conduct of a fiduciary specified in subsection (3) of this
section. The nonvoting, ex officio members of the council shall not be deemed
fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the state
investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the assets of
the retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, and of
the achieving a better life experience program solely in the interests of the
members and beneficiaries of the retirement systems or the interests of the
participants and beneficiaries of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust
and the achieving a better life experience program, as the case may be, for the
exclusive purposes of providing benefits to members, members' beneficiaries,
participants, and participants' beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses
incurred within the limitations and according to the powers, duties, and
purposes prescribed by law.
(2)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have the responsibility
for the investment management of the assets of state funds. The appointed
members shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to the investment of the
assets of state funds and shall be held to the standard of conduct of a
fiduciary specified in subsection (3) of this section. The nonvoting, ex
officio members of the council shall not be deemed fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the state
investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the assets of
state funds solely in the interests of the citizens of the state within the
limitations and according to the powers, duties, and purposes prescribed by
law.
(3) The appointed members of the council shall act with the care, skill,
prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent
person acting in like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the
conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims by diversifying
the investments of the assets of the retirement systems, the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust, the achieving a better life experience program,
and state funds so as to minimize risk of large losses, unless in light of such
circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so. No assets of the retirement
systems, the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, or the achieving a better
life experience program shall be invested or reinvested if the sole or primary
investment objective is for economic development or social purposes or
objectives.
(4) Neither the appointed members of the council nor the state investment
officer shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to investments of the assets
of a retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act made by or on behalf of the board of education as defined in
-8-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
section 79-978 or the board of trustees provided for in section 79-980. Neither
the council nor any member thereof nor the state investment officer shall be
liable for the action or inaction of the board of education or the board of
trustees with respect to the investment of the assets of a retirement system
provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the
consequences of any such action or inaction of the board of education or the
board of trustees, and any claims, suits, losses, damages, fees, and costs
related to such action or inaction or consequences thereof.
Sec. 25. Section 76-214, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
76-214 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
grantee who has a deed to real estate recorded and every purchaser of real
estate who has a memorandum of contract or land contract recorded shall, at the
time such deed, memorandum of contract, or land contract is presented for
recording, file with the register of deeds a completed statement as prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner. For all deeds and all memoranda of contract and land
contracts recorded on and after January 1, 2001, the statement shall not
require the social security number of the grantee or purchaser or the federal
employer identification number of the grantee or purchaser. This statement may
require the recitation of any information contained in the deed, memorandum of
contract, or land contract, the total consideration paid, the amount of the
total consideration attributable to factors other than the purchase of the real
estate itself, and other factors which may influence the transaction. If a
death certificate is recorded as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
this statement may require a date of death, the name of the decedent, and
whether the title is affected as a result of a transfer on death deed, a joint
tenancy deed, or the expiration of a life estate or by any other means. This
statement shall ask whether the affidavit described in section 76-2,141 is
required with respect to the deed, memorandum of contract, or land contract
and, if so, whether such affidavit has been completed. This statement shall be
signed and filed by the grantee, the purchaser, or his or her authorized agent.
The register of deeds shall forward the statement to the county assessor. If
the grantee or purchaser fails to furnish the prescribed statement, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed, memorandum of contract, or land
contract. The register of deeds shall indicate on the statement the book and
page or computer system reference where the deed, memorandum of contract, or
land contract is recorded and shall immediately forward the statement to the
county assessor. The county assessor shall process the statement according to
the instructions of the Property Tax Administrator and shall, pursuant to the
rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner, forward the statement to the Tax
Commissioner.
(2)(a) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
filed at the time that a certified or authenticated copy of the grantor's death
certificate is filed if such death certificate is required to be filed under
section 76-2,126 and the conveyance of real estate was pursuant to a transfer
on death deed.
(b) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be
required to be filed at the time that a transfer on death deed is filed or at
the time that an instrument of revocation of a transfer on death deed as
described in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of section 76-3413 is filed.
(3) Any person shall have access to the statements at the office of the
Tax Commissioner, county assessor, or register of deeds if the statements are
available and have not been disposed of pursuant to the records retention and
disposition schedule as approved by the State Records Administrator.
(4) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be
required if the document being recorded is an easement or an oil, gas, or
mineral lease, or any subsequent assignment of an easement or such lease,
except that such statement shall be required for conservation easements and
preservation easements as such terms are defined in section 76-2,111 and
recreational trail easements used to qualify for the property tax exemption
provided by the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
Sec. 26. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the extent
used or being developed for use by the state or governmental subdivision for a
public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means (A)
property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision or (B)
property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental subdivision in that
it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired under a lease-purchase
agreement, financing lease, or other instrument which provides for transfer of
legal title to the property to the state or a governmental subdivision upon
payment of all amounts due thereunder. If the property to be beneficially owned
by a governmental subdivision has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the
threshold amount or will be used as the site of a public building with a total
estimated construction cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such
property shall qualify for an exemption under this section only if the question
of acquiring such property or constructing such public building has been
submitted at a primary, general, or special election held within the
governmental subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the
governmental subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount
means the greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
-9-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general operation
of government, public education, public safety, transportation, public works,
civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare, developments by a public
housing authority, parks, culture, recreation, community development, and
cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the duties and responsibilities
conferred by law with or without consideration. Public purpose does not include
leasing of property to a private party unless the lease of the property is at
fair market value for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing
authority to low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the
authority's public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions which
is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but upon which a
payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue, and emergency
services and road or street construction or maintenance services to all
governmental units providing such services to the property. Except as provided
in Article VIII, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in
lieu of taxes shall be based on the proportionate share of the cost of
providing public safety, rescue, or emergency services and road or street
construction or maintenance services unless a general policy is adopted by the
governing body of the governmental subdivision providing such services which
provides for a different method of determining the amount of the payment in
lieu of taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by majority
vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such ordinance or
resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable contribution for the cost
of providing such services to the exempt property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of any such
educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization, and used
exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery purposes, when
such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain or profit to either
the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic liquors for more than
twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an organization which
discriminates in membership or employment based on race, color, or national
origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated exclusively
for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic instruction in
academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting students through
services relating to the origination, processing, or guarantying of federally
reinsured student loans for higher education, (II) a museum or historical
society operated exclusively for the benefit and education of the public, or
(III) a nonprofit organization that owns or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of the
public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal benefit society
organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i) of
this section shall apply to any skilled nursing facility as defined in section
71-429, nursing facility as defined in section 71-424, or assisted-living
facility as defined in section 71-5903 that provides housing for medicaid
beneficiaries, except that the exemption amount for such property shall be a
percentage of the property taxes that would otherwise be due. Such percentage
shall be equal to the average percentage of occupied beds in the facility
provided to medicaid beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i) of
this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a charitable
organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance at an educational
institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational institution as approved
student housing, except that the exemption shall only apply to the commons area
of such building, including any common rooms and cooking and eating facilities;
and
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for financial
gain or profit to either the owner or user; and .
(f) A portion of the property owned by a taxpayer as provided in the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental trees
planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the valuation of
land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible personal
property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be registered
for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt from payment of
property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the personal
property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business inventory includes
personal property owned for purposes of leasing or renting such property to
-10-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
others for financial gain only if the personal property is of a type which in
the ordinary course of business is leased or rented thirty days or less and may
be returned at the option of the lessee or renter at any time and the personal
property is of a type which would be considered household goods or personal
effects if owned by an individual. All other personal property owned for
purposes of leasing or renting such property to others for financial gain shall
not be considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of section
77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage Act or
the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source shall be exempt from
the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property. Any
depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source shall be
exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property
if such depreciable tangible personal property was installed on or after
January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.
Depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source
includes, but is not limited to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers,
solar panels, trackers, generating equipment, transmission components,
substations, supporting structures or racks, inverters, and other system
components such as wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up
transformers.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person operating
a data center located in this state, that is assembled, engineered, processed,
fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible
personal property, both in component form or that of an assembled product, for
the purpose of subsequent use at a physical location outside this state by the
person operating a data center shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
Such exemption extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power
over tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state. For
purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting equipment,
and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are designed to
centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data and information,
environmentally controlled structures or facilities or interrelated structures
or facilities that provide the infrastructure for housing the equipment, such
as raised flooring, electricity supply, communication and data lines, Internet
access, cooling, security, and fire suppression, and any building housing the
foregoing.
(11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns property
required to be reported to the county assessor under section 77-1201 shall be
allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal Property Tax Relief
Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns property
required to be valued by the state as provided in section 77-601, 77-682,
77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a compensating exemption factor as provided
in the Personal Property Tax Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal property tax
if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the federal
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the corporate
limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized to provide end-
users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least one hundred megabits
per second for downloading and at least one hundred megabits per second for
uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to begin.
If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this subsection, the
county assessor shall approve the application within thirty calendar days after
receiving the application. The application shall be on forms prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications service as
defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet access as defined in
section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to provide
broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited to, wires,
cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers, amplifiers,
rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers, transmitters,
circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and cases, power equipment,
backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment, storage devices, modems, and
other general central office or headend equipment, such as channel cards,
frames, and cabinets, or equipment used in successor technologies, including
items used to monitor, test, maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying
equipment, machinery, software, ancillary components, appurtenances,
-11-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
accessories, or other infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to
provide broadband communications service. Machinery or equipment used to
produce broadband communications service does not include personal consumer
electronics, including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and
tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined in
26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2024.
Sec. 27. Section 77-202.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-202.01 (1) Any organization, or society, or taxpayer seeking a tax
exemption provided in subdivision subdivisions (1)(c), and (d), or (f) of
section 77-202 for any real or tangible personal property, except real property
used for cemetery purposes, shall apply for exemption to the county assessor on
or before December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is
sought on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. Applications that lack an
estimated valuation, or any other required information, shall result in the
denial of the requested exemption. The county assessor shall examine the
application and recommend either taxable or exempt for the real property or
tangible personal property to the county board of equalization on or before
March 1 following. For applications involving property described in subdivision
(1)(d)(iii) or (iv) of section 77-202, the county assessor shall also calculate
the exemption amount for the property and shall submit such calculation to the
county board of equalization along with his or her recommendations. Notice that
a list of the applications from organizations, societies, and taxpayers seeking
tax exemption, descriptions of the property, and recommendations of the county
assessor are available in the county assessor's office shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county at least ten days prior to
consideration of any application by the county board of equalization.
(2) Any organization, or society, or taxpayer which fails to file an
exemption application on or before December 31 may apply on or before June 30
to the county assessor. The organization, or society, or taxpayer shall also
file in writing a request with the county board of equalization for a waiver so
that the county assessor may consider the application for exemption. The county
board of equalization shall grant the waiver upon a finding that good cause
exists for the failure to make application on or before December 31. When the
waiver is granted, the county assessor shall examine the application and
recommend either taxable or exempt for the real property or tangible personal
property to the county board of equalization, shall calculate the exemption
amount for any property described in subdivision (1)(d)(iii) or (iv) of section
77-202, and shall assess a penalty against the property of ten percent of the
tax that would have been assessed had the waiver been denied or one hundred
dollars, whichever is less, for each calendar month or fraction thereof for
which the filing of the exemption application missed the December 31 deadline.
The penalty shall be collected and distributed in the same manner as a tax on
the property and interest shall be assessed at the rate specified in section
45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature,
from the date the tax would have been delinquent until paid. The penalty shall
also become a lien in the same manner as a tax pursuant to section 77-203.
Sec. 28. Section 77-202.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-202.03 (1) Except as provided in section 77-202.10 and subsection (2)
of this section, a properly granted exemption of real or tangible personal
property provided for in subdivisions (1)(c) and (d) of section 77-202 shall
continue for a period of four years if the statement of reaffirmation of
exemption required by subsection (3) of this section is filed when due. The
four-year period shall begin with years evenly divisible by four. A properly
granted exemption of real property provided for in subdivision (1)(f) of
section 77-202 shall continue for the period described in section 4 of this act
without the need to file any statement of reaffirmation of exemption under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) An owner of property which has been granted an exemption under
subdivision (1)(d)(iii) or (iv) of section 77-202 shall be required to reapply
for the exemption each year so that the exemption amount for the year can be
recalculated.
(3) In each intervening year occurring between application years, the
organization or society which filed the granted exemption application under
subdivision (1)(c) or (d) of section 77-202 for the real or tangible personal
property, except real property used for cemetery purposes and real property
described in subdivision (1)(d)(iii) or (iv) of section 77-202, shall file a
statement of reaffirmation of exemption with the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is sought,
on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, certifying that the ownership and
use of the exempted property has not changed during the year. Any organization
or society which misses the December 31 deadline for filing the statement of
reaffirmation of exemption may file the statement of reaffirmation of exemption
by June 30. Such filing shall maintain the tax-exempt status of the property
without further action by the county and regardless of any previous action by
the county board of equalization to deny the exemption due to late filing of
the statement of reaffirmation of exemption. Upon any such late filing, the
county assessor shall assess a penalty against the property of ten percent of
the tax that would have been assessed had the statement of reaffirmation of
exemption not been filed or one hundred dollars, whichever is less, for each
calendar month or fraction thereof for which the filing of the statement of
-12-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
reaffirmation of exemption is late. The penalty shall be collected and
distributed in the same manner as a tax on the property and interest shall be
assessed at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time
to time be adjusted by the Legislature, from the date the tax would have been
delinquent until paid. The penalty shall also become a lien in the same manner
as a tax pursuant to section 77-203.
(4)(a) If any organization, or society, or taxpayer seeks a tax exemption
under subdivision (1)(c), (d), or (f) of section 77-202 for any real or
tangible personal property acquired on or after January 1 of any year or
converted to exempt use on or after January 1 of any year, the organization, or
society, or taxpayer shall make application for exemption on or before July 1
of that year as provided in subsection (1) of section 77-202.01. The procedure
for reviewing the application shall be as in sections 77-202.01 to 77-202.05,
except that the exempt use shall be determined as of the date of application
and the review by the county board of equalization shall be completed by August
15.
(b) If an organization as described in subdivision (1)(c) or (d) of
section 77-202 purchases, between July 1 and the levy date, property that has
been granted tax exemption and the property continues to be qualified for a
property tax exemption, the purchaser shall on or before November 15 make
application for exemption as provided in section 77-202.01. The procedure for
reviewing the application shall be as in sections 77-202.01 to 77-202.05, and
the review by the county board of equalization shall be completed by December
15.
(c) If a taxpayer purchases, between July 1 and the levy date, property
described in subdivision (1)(f) of section 77-202 that has been granted tax
exemption and the property continues to be qualified for a property tax
exemption, the purchaser shall on or before November 15 make application for
exemption as provided in section 77-202.01. The procedure for reviewing the
application shall be as in sections 77-202.01 to 77-202.05, and the review by
the county board of equalization shall be completed by December 15.
(5) In any year, the county assessor or the county board of equalization
may cause a review of any exemption to determine whether the exemption is
proper. Such a review may be taken even if the ownership or use of the property
has not changed from the date of the allowance of the exemption. If it is
determined that a change in an exemption is warranted, the procedure for
hearing set out in section 77-202.02 shall be followed, except that the
published notice shall state that the list provided in the county assessor's
office only includes those properties being reviewed. If an exemption is
denied, the county board of equalization shall place the property on the tax
rolls retroactive to January 1 of that year if on the date of the decision of
the county board of equalization the property no longer qualifies for an
exemption.
The county board of equalization shall give notice of the assessed value
of the real property in the same manner as outlined in section 77-1507, and the
procedures for filing a protest shall be the same as those in section 77-1502.
When personal property which was exempt becomes taxable because of lost
exemption status, the owner or his or her agent has thirty days after the date
of denial to file a personal property return with the county assessor. Upon the
expiration of the thirty days for filing a personal property return pursuant to
this subsection, the county assessor shall proceed to list and value the
personal property and apply the penalty pursuant to section 77-1233.04.
(6) During the month of September of each year, the county board of
equalization shall cause to be published in a paper of general circulation in
the county a list of all real estate in the county exempt from taxation for
that year pursuant to subdivisions (1)(c), and (d), and (f) of section 77-202.
Such list shall be grouped into categories as provided by the Property Tax
Administrator. An electronic copy of the list of real property exemptions and a
copy of the proof of publication shall be forwarded to the Property Tax
Administrator on or before November 1 of each year.
Sec. 29. Section 77-202.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-202.05 The Tax Commissioner shall prescribe forms for distribution to
the county assessors on which persons, corporations, and organizations may
apply for tax-exempt status for real or tangible personal property. The forms
shall include the following information:
(1) Name of owner or owners of the property, and if a corporation, the
names of the officers and directors, and place of incorporation;
(2) Legal description of real property and a general description as to
class and use of all tangible personal property;
(3) The precise statutory provision under which exempt status for such
property is claimed; and
(4) An estimated valuation for the property; and .
(5) For applications for tax-exempt status for property described in
subdivision (1)(f) of section 77-202:
(a) Proof of the recorded easement; and
(b) Certification from the eligible holder, as defined in section 3 of
this act, confirming compliance with public access and connectivity
requirements.
Sec. 30. Section 77-3,110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-3,110 (1) All funds received pursuant to sections 77-3,109 and 77-3,118
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
-13-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund which is hereby created.
(2) On or before September 1, 2020, the State Treasurer shall transfer
fifty-nine thousand five hundred dollars from the College Savings Plan Expense
Fund to the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund.
(2) (3) All money in the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund
shall be administered by the Department of Revenue and shall be used as
follows: (a) Any money transferred to the fund under subsection (2) of this
section shall be used by the Department of Revenue to defray the costs incurred
to implement Laws 2020, LB1042; and (b) All other funds shall be used to defray
the cost of production of the publications listed in section 77-3,109 or of the
listings described in section 77-3,118 and to carry out any administrative
responsibilities of the department.
(3) (4) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Revenue
Miscellaneous Receipts Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 31. Section 77-1613, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1613 After the levy of taxes has been made and before November 20, the
county assessor shall transcribe the assessments into a suitable book to be
provided at the expense of the county, properly ruled and headed with the
distinct columns in which shall be entered the description of the lands, number
of acres and value, number of city and village lots and their value, taxable
value of taxable personal property, delinquent taxes of previous years, the
amount of property tax credits not reimbursed by the state, the amount of taxes
due on the day the first installment becomes due, and the amount of delinquent
taxes due on the day the second installment thereof becomes due, as provided by
law, in the event the taxpayer elects to pay taxes in two equal semiannual
installments.
Sec. 32. Section 77-1631, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1631 For purposes of the Property Tax Request Act:
(1) Allowable growth percentage means a percentage equal to the sum of (a)
two percent plus (b) the political subdivision's real growth percentage;
(2) Excess value means an amount equal to the assessed value of the real
property included in a tax increment financing project minus the redevelopment
project valuation for such real property;
(2) (3) Property tax request means the total amount of property taxes
requested to be raised for a political subdivision through the levy imposed
pursuant to section 77-1601, excluding the amount to be levied for the payment
of principal or interest on bonds issued or authorized to be issued by a school
district;
(3) (4) Real growth percentage means the percentage obtained by dividing
(a) the political subdivision's real growth value by (b) the political
subdivision's total real property valuation from the prior year; and
(5) Real growth value means and includes:
(4) Real growth value means the (a) The increase in a political
subdivision's total real property valuation from the prior year to the current
year due to (a) (i) improvements to real property as a result of new
construction and additions to existing buildings, (b) (ii) any other
improvements to real property which increase the value of such property, (c)
(iii) annexation of real property by the political subdivision, (d) and (iv) a
change in the use of real property, (e) any increase in personal property
valuation over the prior year, and (f) the accumulated excess valuation over
the redevelopment project valuation described in section 18-2147 of the
Community Development Law for redevelopment projects within the political
subdivision in the year immediately after the division of taxes for such
redevelopment project has ended. ; and
(b) The annual increase in the excess value for any tax increment
financing project located in the political subdivision;
(6) Redevelopment project valuation has the same meaning as in section
18-2103; and
(7) Tax increment financing project means a redevelopment project as
defined in section 18-2103 that is financed through the division of taxes as
provided in section 18-2147.
Sec. 33. Section 77-1701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1701 (1) The county treasurer shall be ex officio county collector of
all taxes levied within the county. The county board shall designate a county
official to mail or otherwise deliver a statement of the amount of taxes due
and a notice that special assessments are due, to the last-known address of the
person, firm, association, or corporation against whom such taxes or special
assessments are assessed or to the lending institution or other party
responsible for paying such taxes or special assessments. Such statement shall
clearly indicate, for each political subdivision, the levy rate and the amount
of property taxes due to fund any and all public safety services as defined in
section 13-320, county attorneys, and public defenders, regardless of whether
such amount is taken as an exception to the political subdivision's property
tax request authority under section 13-3404. Such statement shall also clearly
indicate, for each political subdivision, the levy rate and the amount of taxes
due as the result of principal or interest payments on bonds issued by the
political subdivision and shall show such rate and amount separate from any
-14-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
other levy. When taxes on real property are delinquent for a prior year, the
county treasurer shall indicate this information on the current year tax
statement in bold letters. The information provided shall inform the taxpayer
that delinquent taxes and interest are due for the prior year or years and
shall indicate the specific year or years for which such taxes and interest
remain unpaid. The language shall read "Back Taxes and Interest Due For",
followed by numbers to indicate each year for which back taxes and interest are
due and a statement indicating that failure to pay the back taxes and interest
may result in the loss of the real property. Failure to receive such statement
or notice shall not relieve the taxpayer from any liability to pay such taxes
or special assessments and any interest or penalties accrued thereon. In any
county in which a city of the metropolitan class is located, all statements of
taxes shall also include notice that special assessments for cutting weeds,
removing litter, and demolishing buildings are due.
(2) Notice that special assessments are due shall not be required for
special assessments levied by sanitary and improvement districts organized
under Chapter 31, article 7, except that such notice may be provided by the
county at the discretion of the county board or by the sanitary and improvement
district with the approval of the county board.
(3) A statement of the amount of taxes due and a notice that special
assessments are due shall not be required to be mailed or otherwise delivered
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the total amount of the taxes and
special assessments due is less than two dollars. Failure to receive the
statement or notice shall not relieve the taxpayer from any liability to pay
the taxes or special assessments but shall relieve the taxpayer from any
liability for interest or penalties. Taxes and special assessments of less than
two dollars shall be added to the amount of taxes and special assessments due
in subsequent years and shall not be considered delinquent until the total
amount is two dollars or more.
Sec. 34. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals as
a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against the
income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of greater
than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal to twenty-five
percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2015, such nonrefundable credit shall be allowed
only if the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating
loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for
the federal credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of twenty-
nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a percentage of the
federal credit allowable under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, whether or not the federal credit was limited by the federal tax
liability. The percentage of the federal credit shall be one hundred percent
for incomes not greater than twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage
shall be reduced by ten percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction
thereof, by which the reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two
thousand dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the
individual would have received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was
deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for individuals
who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning farmer or
livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit under the Adoption Tax Credit Act, the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act,
the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Research and Development Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the
Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit allowed
under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that
for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015,
such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 32 of the code after adding
back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted pursuant to
such section in determining eligibility for the federal credit.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable credit
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section 77-2716.01;
-15-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
(b) A credit for contributions to programs or projects certified for tax
credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act.
Each partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S corporation, each
beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a limited liability
company shall report his or her share of the credit in the same manner and
proportion as he or she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation,
estate, trust, or limited liability company income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in section
77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and 77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and agricultural
producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to another
state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for contributions to programs or
projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating High
Impact Economic Futures Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit
Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The credit allowed
for each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust qualifying for an
income tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act shall be equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or
beneficiary's portion of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to
subsection (6) of section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, and
before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of
a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to the
state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be allowed to each
partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal
to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by
a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report his or
her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or she reports
the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary cannot
fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit may not be carried forward
or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided
in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2020, and before January 1, 2032 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five thousand dollars shall be
allowed to any individual who purchases a residence during the taxable year if
such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely blighted
area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a family
member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual cannot
fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried forward to
subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection with
respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to recapture
by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the credit sells or
otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the residence as his or her
-16-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
primary residence within five years after the end of the taxable year in which
the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an individual's
spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent, whether by
blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in the
Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a refundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall
be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of gestation;
and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual claiming
the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections 77-3156, 77-3158, and
77-3159.
Sec. 35. Section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2716 (1) The following adjustments to federal adjusted gross income or,
for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be made for
interest or dividends received:
(a)(i) There shall be subtracted interest or dividends received by the
owner of obligations of the United States and its territories and possessions
or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to the
extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes but exempt
from state income taxes under the laws of the United States; and
(ii) There shall be subtracted interest received by the owner of
obligations of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions or
authorities which are Build America Bonds to the extent includable in gross
income for federal income tax purposes;
(b) There shall be subtracted that portion of the total dividends and
other income received from a regulated investment company which is attributable
to obligations described in subdivision (a) of this subsection as reported to
the recipient by the regulated investment company;
(c) There shall be added interest or dividends received by the owner of
obligations of the District of Columbia, other states of the United States, or
their political subdivisions, authorities, commissions, or instrumentalities to
the extent excluded in the computation of gross income for federal income tax
purposes except that such interest or dividends shall not be added if received
by a corporation which is a regulated investment company;
(d) There shall be added that portion of the total dividends and other
income received from a regulated investment company which is attributable to
obligations described in subdivision (c) of this subsection and excluded for
federal income tax purposes as reported to the recipient by the regulated
investment company; and
(e)(i) Any amount subtracted under this subsection shall be reduced by any
interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the obligations or securities
described in this subsection or the investment in the regulated investment
company and by any expenses incurred in the production of interest or dividend
income described in this subsection to the extent that such expenses, including
amortizable bond premiums, are deductible in determining federal taxable
income.
(ii) Any amount added under this subsection shall be reduced by any
expenses incurred in the production of such income to the extent disallowed in
the computation of federal taxable income.
(2) There shall be allowed a net operating loss derived from or connected
with Nebraska sources computed under rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent possible under
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the United States. For a
resident individual, estate, or trust, the net operating loss computed on the
federal income tax return shall be adjusted by the modifications contained in
this section. For a nonresident individual, estate, or trust or for a partial-
year resident individual, the net operating loss computed on the federal return
shall be adjusted by the modifications contained in this section and any
carryovers or carrybacks shall be limited to the portion of the loss derived
from or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income for all
-17-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the amount of any state
income tax refund to the extent such refund was deducted under the Internal
Revenue Code, was not allowed in the computation of the tax due under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and is included in federal adjusted gross income.
(4) Federal adjusted gross income, or, for a fiduciary, federal taxable
income shall be modified to exclude the portion of the income or loss received
from a small business corporation with an election in effect under subchapter S
of the Internal Revenue Code or from a limited liability company organized
pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act that is not
derived from or connected with Nebraska sources as determined in section
77-2734.01.
(5) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income dividends received or
deemed to be received from corporations which are not subject to the Internal
Revenue Code.
(6) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income a portion of the
income earned by a corporation subject to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
that is actually taxed by a foreign country or one of its political
subdivisions at a rate in excess of the maximum federal tax rate for
corporations. The taxpayer may make the computation for each foreign country or
for groups of foreign countries. The portion of the taxes that may be deducted
shall be computed in the following manner:
(a) The amount of federal taxable income from operations within a foreign
taxing jurisdiction shall be reduced by the amount of taxes actually paid to
the foreign jurisdiction that are not deductible solely because the foreign tax
credit was elected on the federal income tax return;
(b) The amount of after-tax income shall be divided by one minus the
maximum tax rate for corporations in the Internal Revenue Code; and
(c) The result of the calculation in subdivision (b) of this subsection
shall be subtracted from the amount of federal taxable income used in
subdivision (a) of this subsection. The result of such calculation, if greater
than zero, shall be subtracted from federal taxable income.
(7) Federal adjusted gross income shall be modified to exclude any amount
repaid by the taxpayer for which a reduction in federal tax is allowed under
section 1341(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(8)(a) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced, to the extent included, by income from
interest, earnings, and state contributions received from the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust as provided created in sections 40 85-1801 to 55
of this act 85-1817 and any account established under the achieving a better
life experience program as provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409.
(b) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by any contributions as a participant
in the Nebraska educational savings plan trust or contributions to an account
established under the achieving a better life experience program made for the
benefit of a beneficiary as provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, to the
extent not deducted for federal income tax purposes, but not to exceed five
thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten thousand dollars for
any other return. With respect to a qualified rollover within the meaning of
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code from another state's plan, any
interest, earnings, and state contributions received from the other state's
educational savings plan which is qualified under section 529 of the code shall
qualify for the reduction provided in this subdivision. For contributions by a
custodian of a custodial account including rollovers from another custodial
account, the reduction shall only apply to funds added to the custodial account
after January 1, 2014.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income shall be reduced, to the extent included in the adjusted gross
income of an individual, by the amount of any contribution made by the
individual's employer into an account under the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust owned by the individual, not to exceed five thousand dollars per
married filing separate return or ten thousand dollars for any other return.
(d) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be increased by:
(i) The amount resulting from the cancellation of a participation
agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a participant in the Nebraska educational
savings plan trust to the extent previously deducted under subdivision (8)(b)
of this section; and
(ii) The amount of any withdrawals by the owner of an account established
under the achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections
77-1401 to 77-1409 for nonqualified expenses to the extent previously deducted
under subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(9)(a) For income tax returns filed after September 10, 2001, for taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2006, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased by
eighty-five percent of any amount of any federal bonus depreciation received
under the federal Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act of 2002 or the federal
Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003, under section 168(k) or section 1400L of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for assets placed in service after
September 10, 2001, and before December 31, 2005.
(b) For a partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, including
-18-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
any cooperative exempt from income taxes under section 521 of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative association, subchapter S
corporation, or joint venture, the increase shall be distributed to the
partners, members, shareholders, patrons, or beneficiaries in the same manner
as income is distributed for use against their income tax liabilities.
(c) For a corporation with a unitary business having activity both inside
and outside the state, the increase shall be apportioned to Nebraska in the
same manner as income is apportioned to the state by section 77-2734.05.
(d) The amount of bonus depreciation added to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income by this
subsection shall be subtracted in a later taxable year. Twenty percent of the
total amount of bonus depreciation added back by this subsection for tax years
beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2003, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, may be subtracted in the first taxable year beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following
taxable years. Twenty percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added
back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first taxable year beginning or
deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following taxable
years.
(10) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2003, and before January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be increased by the amount of any capital
investment that is expensed under section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, that is in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars that is
allowed under the federal Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003. Twenty percent of
the total amount of expensing added back by this subsection for tax years
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in
the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent
in each of the next four following tax years.
(11)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income shall be reduced by contributions, up to two thousand dollars per
married filing jointly return or one thousand dollars for any other return, and
any investment earnings made as a participant in the Nebraska long-term care
savings plan under the Long-Term Care Savings Plan Act, to the extent not
deducted for federal income tax purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2018,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross
income shall be increased by the withdrawals made as a participant in the
Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the act by a person who is not a
qualified individual or for any reason other than transfer of funds to a
spouse, long-term care expenses, long-term care insurance premiums, or death of
the participant, including withdrawals made by reason of cancellation of the
participation agreement, to the extent previously deducted as a contribution or
as investment earnings.
(12) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income for
individuals, estates, and trusts any amount taken as a credit for franchise tax
paid by a financial institution under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 as allowed by
subsection (5) of section 77-2715.07.
(13)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2015, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount
received as benefits under the federal Social Security Act which are included
in the federal adjusted gross income if:
(i) For taxpayers filing a married filing joint return, federal adjusted
gross income is fifty-eight thousand dollars or less; or
(ii) For taxpayers filing any other return, federal adjusted gross income
is forty-three thousand dollars or less.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the dollar amounts provided in
subdivisions (13)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section by the same percentage used to
adjust individual income tax brackets under subsection (3) of section
77-2715.03.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal adjusted gross income
allowed under this subsection or the reduction to federal adjusted gross income
allowed under subsection (14) of this section, whichever provides the greater
reduction.
(14)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income shall be reduced by a percentage of the social security benefits
that are received and included in federal adjusted gross income. The pertinent
percentage shall be:
(i) Five percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended;
-19-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
(ii) Forty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended;
(iii) Sixty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended; and
(iv) One hundred percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, social security benefits means
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal adjusted gross income
allowed under this subsection or the reduction to federal adjusted gross income
allowed under subsection (13) of this section, whichever provides the greater
reduction.
(15)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, an individual may make a one-time election within two calendar
years after the date of his or her retirement from the military to exclude
income received as a military retirement benefit by the individual to the
extent included in federal adjusted gross income and as provided in this
subdivision. The individual may elect to exclude forty percent of his or her
military retirement benefit income for seven consecutive taxable years
beginning with the year in which the election is made or may elect to exclude
fifteen percent of his or her military retirement benefit income for all
taxable years beginning with the year in which he or she turns sixty-seven
years of age.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may
exclude one hundred percent of the military retirement benefit income received
by such individual to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, military retirement benefit means
retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to service in the
uniformed services of the United States for personal services performed by an
individual prior to his or her retirement. The term includes retirement
benefits described in this subdivision that are reported to the individual on
either:
(i) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Department of Defense; or
(ii) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Office of Personnel Management.
(16) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income shall be reduced by the amount received as a Segal AmeriCorps
Education Award, to the extent such amount is included in federal adjusted
gross income.
(17) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income shall be reduced by the amount received by or on behalf of a
firefighter for cancer benefits under the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act to
the extent included in federal adjusted gross income.
(18) There shall be subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of
individuals any amount received by the individual as student loan repayment
assistance under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act, to the extent such amount is
included in federal adjusted gross income.
(19) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2023, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a retired individual
who was employed full time as a firefighter or certified law enforcement
officer for at least twenty years and who is at least sixty years of age as of
the end of the taxable year may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income
by the amount of health insurance premiums paid by such individual during the
taxable year, to the extent such premiums were not already deducted in
determining the individual's federal adjusted gross income.
(20) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amounts received as
annuities under the Civil Service Retirement System which were earned for being
employed by the federal government, to the extent such amounts are included in
federal adjusted gross income.
(21) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an individual who is
a member of the Nebraska National Guard may exclude one hundred percent of the
income received from any of the following sources to the extent such income is
included in the individual's federal adjusted gross income:
(a) Serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status such as members attending drills,
annual training, and military schools and members who are serving in a 32
U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational support duty status;
(b) Employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with the
Nebraska National Guard; or
(c) Serving in a state active duty status.
(22)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may
-20-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount of interest and
principal balance of medical debt discharged under the Medical Debt Relief Act,
to the extent included in such individual's federal adjusted gross income.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be reduced by the amount of contributions made to the Medical Debt Relief Fund,
to the extent not deducted for federal income tax purposes.
(23) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an individual who is
a qualifying employee as defined in section 77-3108 may reduce his or her
federal adjusted gross income by the amount allowed under section 77-3111.
(24) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted
gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be reduced by the amounts allowed to be deducted pursuant to section 77-27,242.
(25) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net capital loss that
is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver bullion to the extent
such loss is included in federal adjusted gross income except that such loss
shall not be added if the loss is derived from the sale of bullion as a taxable
distribution from any retirement plan account that holds gold or silver
bullion. For the purposes of this subsection, bullion has the same meaning as
in section 77-2704.66.
(26) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net capital gain that
is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver bullion to the extent
such gain is included in federal adjusted gross income except that such gain
shall not be subtracted if the gain is derived from the sale of bullion as a
taxable distribution from any retirement plan account that holds gold or silver
bullion. For the purposes of this subsection, bullion has the same meaning as
in section 77-2704.66.
Sec. 36. Section 77-2727, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2727 (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and
subsection (5) of section 77-2775, a partnership as such shall not be subject
to the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Persons or their
authorized representatives carrying on business as partners shall be liable for
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 only in their
separate or individual capacities.
(2) The partners of such partnership who are residents of this state or
corporations shall include in their incomes their proportionate share of such
partnership's income.
(3) If any partner of such partnership is a nonresident individual during
any part of the partnership's reporting year, he or she shall file a Nebraska
income tax return which shall include in Nebraska adjusted gross income that
portion of the partnership's Nebraska income, as determined under the
provisions of sections 77-2728 and 77-2729, allocable to his or her interest in
the partnership and shall execute and forward to the partnership, on or before
the original due date of the Nebraska partnership return, an agreement which
states that he or she will file a Nebraska income tax return and pay income tax
on all income derived from or attributable to sources in this state, and such
agreement shall be attached to the partnership's Nebraska return for such
reporting year.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, in the
absence of the nonresident individual partner's executed agreement being
attached to the Nebraska partnership return, the partnership shall remit a
portion of such partner's income which was derived from or attributable to
Nebraska sources with its Nebraska return for the reporting year. For tax years
beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance,
in such instance, shall be the highest individual income tax rate determined
under section 77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident individual partner's
share of the partnership income which was derived from or attributable to
sources within this state. For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall be the
highest individual income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.03
multiplied by the nonresident individual partner's share of the partnership
income which was derived from or attributable to sources within this state.
(b) Any amount remitted on behalf of any partner shall be allowed as a
credit against the Nebraska income tax liability of the partner.
(c) Subdivision (a) of this subsection does not apply to a publicly traded
partnership as defined by section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, that is treated as a partnership for the purposes of the code and
that has agreed to file an annual information return with the Department of
Revenue reporting the name, address, taxpayer identification number, and other
information requested by the department of each unit holder with an income in
the state in excess of five hundred dollars.
(5) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident individual partner to not
file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident individual partner's only
source of Nebraska income was his or her share of the partnership's income
which was derived from or attributable to sources within this state, the
-21-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
nonresident did not file an agreement to file a Nebraska income tax return, and
the partnership has remitted the amount required by subsection (4) of this
section on behalf of such nonresident individual partner. The amount remitted
shall be retained in satisfaction of the Nebraska income tax liability of the
nonresident individual partner.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2018, a partnership may annually make an irrevocable election to pay the taxes,
interest, or penalties levied by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 at the entity
level for the taxable period covered by such return. For tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2023, such election may be made on the applicable income
tax return and shall must be made on or before the due date for filing the
applicable income tax return, including any extensions that have been granted;
(b) An electing partnership with respect to a taxable period shall pay an
income tax equivalent to the highest individual income tax rate provided in
section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the electing partnership's net income as
apportioned or allocated to this state in accordance with the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, for such taxable period;
(c) An electing partnership shall be treated as a corporation with respect
to the requirements of section 77-2769 for payments of estimated tax. The
requirement for payment of estimated tax under section 77-2769 shall not apply
for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2024. Payments of estimated tax
made by an eligible partnership that does not make an election under this
subsection shall be treated as income tax withholding on behalf of the
partners;
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this subsection, the partners
of an electing partnership shall must file a Nebraska return to report their
pro rata or distributive share of the income of the electing partnership in
accordance with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as applicable. In determining
the sum of its pro rata or distributive share and computing the tax under this
subsection, an electing partnership shall add back any amount of Nebraska
income tax imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and deducted by the
electing partnership for federal income tax purposes under section 164 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(e) A nonresident individual who is a partner of an electing partnership
shall not be required to file a Nebraska tax return for a taxable year if, for
such taxable year, the only source of income derived from or connected with
sources within this state for such partner, or for the partner and the
partner's spouse if a joint federal income tax return is filed, is from one or
more electing partnerships or electing small business corporations as defined
in subdivision (9)(a) of section 77-2734.01 for such taxable year and such
nonresident individual partner's tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967
would be fully satisfied by the credit allowed to such partner under
subdivision (g) of this subsection;
(f) If the amount calculated under subdivision (a) of this subsection
results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may not be carried
forward to succeeding taxable years;
(g)(i) A refundable credit shall be available to the partners in an amount
equal to their pro rata or distributive share of the Nebraska income tax paid
by the electing partnership. For tax returns filed for taxable years beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2022, such credit shall be allowed
for the same taxable year for which the election is made, without regard to the
year in which the tax is paid to Nebraska or deducted on a federal income tax
return;
(ii) In the case of a partnership or small business corporation that is a
partner of an electing partnership, the refundable credit under this
subdivision (g) shall (A) be allowed to its partners or shareholders in
accordance with the determination of income and distributive share of the
Nebraska income tax paid by the electing partnership or (B) be applied against
the partner's tax, interest, and penalty. Any excess credit deemed an
overpayment may be refunded or applied to the subsequent tax year;
(iii) If a partnership making the election under this subsection is a
partner of another electing partnership, net income shall be computed as
provided in subsection (1) of this section. The upper tier electing partnership
shall claim a credit for the tax paid by the lower tier electing partnership.
The upper tier electing partnership shall distribute out the pro rata or
distributive share of the credits to its partners for tax paid under this
subsection by all tiers of electing partnerships. As used in this subdivision,
the term lower tier electing partnership means an electing partnership in which
some or all of the partners are an electing partnership. The term upper tier
electing partnership means an electing partnership that is a partner of a lower
tier electing partnership. An electing partnership may have two or more tiers;
and
(h)(i) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2018, but prior to January 1, 2023, the electing partnership shall must make
the election under this subsection on or after January 1, 2023, but before
December 31, 2025, in the form and manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner
for all years for which the election under this subsection is made on behalf of
the electing partnership. The Tax Commissioner shall establish the form and
manner, which shall not include any changes to the past returns other than
those that are directly related to the election under this subsection.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an electing
partnership files in the form and manner as specified in subdivision (h)(i) of
-22-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
this subsection, the deadline for filing a claim for credit or refund
prescribed in section 77-2793 shall be extended for affected partners of the
electing partnership until the timeframe specified in section 77-2793 or
January 31, 2026, whichever is later. The resulting claim of refund for tax
years beginning prior to January 1, 2023, shall be submitted in the form and
manner as prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. Neither the electing partnership
nor its partners shall incur any penalties for late filing nor owe interest on
such amounts. The Tax Commissioner shall not be required to pay interest on any
amounts owed to the partners resulting from such refund claims.
(iii) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivision (h)(i) of this
subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall have one year from the date an electing
partnership files in the form and manner as specified in subdivision (h)(i) of
this subsection to review and make a written proposed deficiency determination
in accordance with section 77-2786. Any notice of deficiency determination made
as specified in this subdivision may be enforced at any time within six years
from the date of the notice of deficiency determination.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electing partnership means, with respect to a taxable period, an
eligible partnership that has made an election pursuant to subsection (6) of
this section with respect to such taxable period; and
(b) Eligible partnership means any partnership as provided for in section
7701(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code that has a filing requirement under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 other than a publicly traded partnership as
defined in section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code. An eligible partnership
includes any entity, including a limited liability company, treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes that otherwise meets the
requirements of this subdivision.
(8) For purposes of this section, any partner that is a grantor trust of a
nonresident shall be disregarded and this section shall apply as though the
nonresident grantor was the partner.
Sec. 37. Section 77-2734.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2734.01 (1) Residents of Nebraska who are shareholders of a small
business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the
Internal Revenue Code or who are members of a limited liability company
organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act shall
include in their Nebraska taxable income, to the extent includable in federal
gross income, their proportionate share of such corporation's or limited
liability company's federal income adjusted pursuant to this section. Income or
loss from such corporation or limited liability company conducting a business,
trade, profession, or occupation shall be included in the Nebraska taxable
income of a shareholder or member who is a resident of this state to the extent
of such shareholder's or member's proportionate share of the net income or loss
from the conduct of such business, trade, profession, or occupation within this
state, determined under subsection (2) of this section. A resident of Nebraska
shall include in Nebraska taxable income fair compensation for services
rendered to such corporation or limited liability company. Compensation
actually paid shall be presumed to be fair unless it is apparent to the Tax
Commissioner that such compensation is materially different from fair value for
the services rendered or has been manipulated for tax avoidance purposes.
(2) The income of any small business corporation having an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or limited liability
company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act that is derived from or connected with Nebraska sources shall be determined
in the following manner:
(a) If the small business corporation is a member of a unitary group, the
small business corporation shall be deemed to be doing business within this
state if any part of its income is derived from transactions with other members
of the unitary group doing business within this state, and such corporation
shall apportion its income by using the apportionment factor determined for the
entire unitary group, including the small business corporation, under sections
77-2734.05 to 77-2734.15;
(b) If the small business corporation or limited liability company is not
a member of a unitary group and is subject to tax in another state, it shall
apportion its income under sections 77-2734.05 to 77-2734.15; and
(c) If the small business corporation or limited liability company is not
subject to tax in another state, all of its income is derived from or connected
with Nebraska sources.
(3) Nonresidents of Nebraska who are shareholders of such corporations or
members of such limited liability companies shall file a Nebraska income tax
return and shall include in Nebraska adjusted gross income their proportionate
share of the corporation's or limited liability company's Nebraska income as
determined under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The nonresident shareholder or member shall execute and forward to the
corporation or limited liability company before the filing of the corporation's
or limited liability company's return an agreement which states he or she will
file a Nebraska income tax return and pay the tax on the income derived from or
connected with sources in this state, and such agreement shall be attached to
the corporation's or limited liability company's Nebraska return for such
taxable year.
(5) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2013,
in the absence of the nonresident shareholder's or member's executed agreement
being attached to the Nebraska return, the corporation or limited liability
-23-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
company shall remit with the return an amount equal to the highest individual
income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.02 multiplied by the
nonresident shareholder's or member's share of the corporation's or limited
liability company's income which was derived from or attributable to this
state. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2013, in the absence of the nonresident shareholder's or member's executed
agreement being attached to the Nebraska return, the corporation or limited
liability company shall remit with the return an amount equal to the highest
individual income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.03 multiplied by
the nonresident shareholder's or member's share of the corporation's or limited
liability company's income which was derived from or attributable to this
state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit against the Nebraska
income tax liability of the shareholder or member.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident individual shareholder or
member to not file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident individual
shareholder's or member's only source of Nebraska income was his or her share
of the small business corporation's or limited liability company's income which
was derived from or attributable to sources within this state, the nonresident
did not file an agreement to file a Nebraska income tax return, and the small
business corporation or limited liability company has remitted the amount
required by subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident
individual shareholder or member. The amount remitted shall be retained in
satisfaction of the Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident individual
shareholder or member.
(7) A small business corporation or limited liability company return shall
be filed if the small business corporation or limited liability company has
income derived from Nebraska sources.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2018, a small business corporation may annually make an irrevocable election to
pay the taxes, interest, or penalties levied by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967 at the entity level for the taxable period covered by such return. For tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, such election may be made on the
applicable income tax return and shall must be made on or before the due date
for filing the applicable income tax return, including any extensions that have
been granted;
(b) An electing small business corporation with respect to a taxable
period shall pay an income tax equivalent to the highest individual income tax
rate provided in section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the electing small business
corporation's net income as apportioned or allocated to this state in
accordance with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, for such taxable period;
(c) An electing small business corporation shall be treated as a
corporation with respect to the requirements of section 77-2769 for payments of
estimated tax. The requirement for payment of estimated tax under section
77-2769 shall not apply for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2024.
Payments of estimated tax made by an eligible small business corporation that
does not make an election under this subsection shall be treated as income tax
withholding on behalf of the shareholders;
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this subsection, the
shareholders of an electing small business corporation shall must file a
Nebraska return to report their pro rata or distributive share of the income of
the electing small business corporation in accordance with the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, as applicable. In determining the sum of its pro rata or
distributive share and computing the tax under this subsection, an electing
small business corporation shall add back any amount of Nebraska income tax
imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and deducted by the electing
small business corporation for federal income tax purposes under section 164 of
the Internal Revenue Code;
(e) A nonresident individual who is a shareholder of an electing small
business corporation shall not be required to file a Nebraska tax return for a
taxable year if, for such taxable year, the only source of income derived from
or connected with sources within this state for such shareholder, or for the
shareholder and the shareholder's spouse if a joint federal income tax return
is filed, is from one or more electing small business corporations or electing
partnerships as defined in subdivision (7)(a) of section 77-2727 for such
taxable year and such nonresident individual shareholder's tax under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 would be fully satisfied by the credit allowed to
such shareholder under subdivision (g) of this subsection;
(f) If the amount calculated under subdivision (a) of this subsection
results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may not be carried
forward to succeeding taxable years;
(g) A refundable credit shall be available to the shareholders in an
amount equal to their pro rata or distributive share of the Nebraska income tax
paid by the electing small business corporation. For tax returns filed for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2022, such
credit shall be allowed for the same taxable year for which the election is
made, without regard to the year in which the tax is paid to Nebraska or
deducted on a federal income tax return; and
(h)(i) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2018, but prior to January 1, 2023, the electing small business corporation
shall must make the election under this subsection on or after January 1, 2023,
but before December 31, 2025, in the form and manner prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner for all years for which the election under this subsection is made
-24-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
on behalf of the electing small business corporation. The Tax Commissioner
shall establish the form and manner, which shall not include any changes to the
past returns other than those that are directly related to the election under
this subsection.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an electing small
business corporation files in the form and manner as specified in subdivision
(h)(i) of this subsection, the deadline for filing a claim for credit or refund
prescribed in section 77-2793 shall be extended for affected shareholders of
the electing small business corporation until the timeframe specified in
section 77-2793 or January 31, 2026, whichever is later. The resulting claim of
refund for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2023, shall be submitted in
the form and manner as prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. Neither the electing
small business corporation nor its shareholders shall incur any penalties for
late filing nor owe interest on such amounts. The Tax Commissioner shall not be
required to pay interest on any amounts owed to the shareholders resulting from
such refund claims.
(iii) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivision (h)(i) of this
subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall have one year from the date an electing
small business corporation files in the form and manner as specified in
subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection to review and make a written proposed
deficiency determination in accordance with section 77-2786. Any notice of
deficiency determination made as specified in this subdivision may be enforced
at any time within six years from the date of the notice of deficiency
determination.
(9) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electing small business corporation means, with respect to a taxable
period, an eligible small business corporation having an election in effect
under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code that has made an election
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section with respect to such taxable period;
and
(b) Eligible small business corporation means an entity subject to
taxation under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations
thereunder.
(10) For purposes of this section, any shareholder or member of the
corporation or limited liability company that is a grantor trust of a
nonresident shall be disregarded and this section shall apply as though the
nonresident grantor was the shareholder or member.
Sec. 38. Section 77-2776, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2776 (1) As soon as practical after an income tax return is filed, the
Tax Commissioner shall examine it to determine the correct amount of tax. If
the Tax Commissioner finds that the amount of tax shown on the return is less
than the correct amount, he or she shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of
the deficiency proposed to be assessed. If the Tax Commissioner finds that the
tax paid is more than the correct amount, he or she shall credit the
overpayment against any taxes due by the taxpayer and refund the difference.
The Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, make prompt assessment of taxes due
as provided by the laws of the United States for federal income tax purposes.
(2) If the taxpayer fails to file an income tax return, the Tax
Commissioner shall estimate the taxpayer's tax liability from any available
information and notify the taxpayer of the amount proposed to be assessed as in
the case of a deficiency.
(3) A notice of deficiency shall set forth the reason for the proposed
assessment or for the change in the amount of credit or loss to be carried over
to another year. The notice shall include a written statement containing the
details of the facts, circumstances, and reasons the Tax Commissioner used to
determine that the taxpayer did not report the correct amount of tax. The
notice may be mailed to the taxpayer at his or her last-known address. In the
case of a joint return, the notice of deficiency may be a single joint notice,
except that if the Tax Commissioner is notified by either spouse that separate
residences have been established, the Tax Commissioner shall mail joint notices
to each spouse. If the taxpayer is deceased or under a legal disability, a
notice of deficiency may be mailed to his or her last-known address unless the
Tax Commissioner has received notice of the existence of a fiduciary
relationship with respect to such taxpayer.
(4) A notice of deficiency regarding an item of entity income may be
mailed to the entity at its last-known address or to the address of the
entity's tax matters person for federal income tax purposes. Such notice shall
be deemed to have been received by each partner, shareholder, or member of such
entity, but only for items of entity income reported by the partner,
shareholder, or member. The actions taken thereon on behalf of the partnership,
limited liability company, small business corporation, estate, or trust are
binding on the partners, members, shareholders, or beneficiaries.
Sec. 39. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply to tax
year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. For tax year 2024, the total amount of
relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For
tax year 2025, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven
hundred eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the total amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars. For tax
year 2027, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight
hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the total amount of
-25-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred seventy million dollars.
For tax year 2029, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be
nine hundred two million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year
thereafter, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be the total
amount of relief from the prior year increased by three percent. The relief
shall be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each parcel,
the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the county under
subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the current prior year on the parcel to the school district taxes levied in
the current prior year on all real property in the county. The amount so
determined shall be the property tax credit for that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption under
sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for the property
tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any remaining liability
after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the property tax credit
provided in this section results in a property tax liability on the homestead
that is less than zero, the amount of the credit which cannot be used by the
taxpayer shall be returned to the Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the
year the amount disbursed to the county was disbursed. The Property Tax
Administrator shall immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection
to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any
funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each school
district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the amount of
unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be equal
to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of this section
multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied in the prior year
on all real property in the county to the school district taxes levied in the
prior year on all real property in the state. By September 15, 2024, and by
September 15 of each year thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall
determine the amount to be disbursed under this subsection to each county and
shall certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The
disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on
or before January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount The county treasurer shall
disburse amounts received under subsection (4) of this section for costs, the
county treasurer shall disburse the remaining funds, which are credited against
the amount of property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if
such funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to divided
taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development Law shall be
remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be used for
purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under subsection (4)
of this section.
Sec. 40. Section 85-1801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1801 The Legislature finds that the general welfare and well-being of
the state are directly related to educational levels and skills of the citizens
of the state and that a vital and valid public purpose is served by the
creation and implementation of programs which encourage and make possible the
attainment of higher levels of education by the greatest number of citizens of
the state. The state has limited resources to provide additional programs for
higher education funding and the continued operation and maintenance of the
state's public institutions of elementary, secondary, and postsecondary higher
education, and the general welfare of the citizens of the state will be
enhanced by establishing a program which allows parents and others interested
in the higher education of our youth to invest money in a public trust for
future application to the payment of qualified higher education expenses. The
creation of the means of encouragement for persons to invest in such a program
represents the carrying out of a vital and valid public purpose. In order to
make available to parents and others interested in the higher education of our
youth an opportunity to fund future higher education needs, it is necessary
that a public trust be established in which money may be invested for future
educational use.
Sec. 41. Section 85-1802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1802 For purposes of sections 40 85-1801 to 55 of this act 85-1817:
(1) Administrative fund means the Education College Savings Plan
Administrative Fund created in section 45 of this act 85-1807;
(2) Beneficiary means the individual designated by a participation
agreement to benefit from advance payments of qualified higher education
expenses on behalf of the beneficiary;
(3) Benefits means the payment of qualified higher education expenses on
behalf of a beneficiary or, in the case of a qualified education loan payment,
on behalf of a beneficiary or the sibling of a beneficiary by the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust;
(4) Eligible postsecondary educational institution means an institution
-26-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
described in 20 U.S.C. 1088 which is eligible to participate in a program under
Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965;
(5) Expense fund means the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund
created in section 45 of this act 85-1807;
(6) Nebraska educational savings plan trust means the trust created in
section 42 of this act 85-1804;
(7) Nonqualified withdrawal refers to (a) a distribution from an account
to the extent it is not used to pay the qualified higher education expenses of
the beneficiary or, in the case of a qualified education loan payment, to the
extent it is not used to pay the qualified higher education expenses of the
beneficiary or a sibling of the beneficiary or to the extent it does not
constitute a rollover to a Roth individual retirement account as permitted by
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, (b) a qualified rollover permitted by
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code where the funds are transferred to a
qualified tuition program sponsored by another state or entity, or (c) until
January 1, 2029, a distribution from an account to pay the costs of attending
kindergarten through grade twelve;
(8) Participant or account owner means an individual, an individual's
legal representative, or any other legal entity authorized to establish a
savings account under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code who has entered
into a participation agreement for the advance payment of qualified higher
education expenses on behalf of a beneficiary. For purposes of section 77-2716,
as to contributions by a custodian to a custodial account established pursuant
to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or similar law in another
state, which account has been established under a participation agreement,
participant includes the parent or guardian of a minor, which parent or
guardian is also the custodian of the account;
(9) Participation agreement means an agreement between a participant and
the Nebraska educational savings plan trust entered into under sections 40
85-1801 to 55 of this act 85-1817;
(10) Program fund means the Education College Savings Plan Program Fund
created in section 45 of this act 85-1807;
(11) Qualified education loan payment means the payment of principal or
interest on a qualified education loan as defined in 26 U.S.C. 221(d), as such
section existed on January 1, 2022, of the beneficiary or a sibling of the
beneficiary as described in 26 U.S.C. 152(d)(2)(B), as such section existed on
January 1, 2022. For purposes of this subdivision, the aggregate total of
qualified education loan payments for the qualified education loans of a single
beneficiary or sibling shall not exceed ten thousand dollars for all taxable
years combined. The aggregate total for qualified education loan payments for
the qualified education loans of a sibling of a beneficiary shall be calculated
with respect to such sibling and not with respect to the beneficiary and shall
include all qualified education loan payments for loans of such sibling,
including any qualified education loan payments for which such sibling is the
beneficiary or the sibling of a beneficiary;
(12)(a) (12) Qualified higher education expenses means:
(i) The the certified costs of tuition, and fees, books, supplies, and
equipment required (A) (a) for enrollment or attendance at an eligible
postsecondary educational institution or (B) (b) for costs incurred on or after
January 1, 2021, for participation in an apprenticeship program registered and
certified with the United States Secretary of Labor under 29 U.S.C. 50, as such
section existed on January 1, 2021; .
(ii) Reasonable room and board expenses, based on the minimum amount
applicable for the eligible postsecondary educational institution during the
period of enrollment , shall be included as qualified higher education expenses
for those students enrolled on at least a half-time basis; .
(iii) In the case of a special needs beneficiary, expenses for special
needs services incurred in connection with enrollment or attendance at an
eligible postsecondary educational institution; shall be included as qualified
higher education expenses.
(iv) Expenses paid or incurred on or after January 1, 2022, for the
purchase of computer technology or equipment or Internet access and related
services in connection with enrollment or attendance at an eligible
postsecondary educational institution, subject to the limitations set forth in
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code; , shall be included as qualified
higher education expenses.
(v) Qualified higher education expenses includes qualified education loan
payments; or .
(vi) Beginning January 1, 2029, expenses for tuition in connection with
enrollment or attendance at an elementary or secondary school but does not
include any amounts in excess of ten thousand dollars per beneficiary per
taxable year.
(b) Qualified higher education expenses does not include any amounts in
excess of those allowed by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(13) Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code means such section of the
code and the regulations interpreting such section; and
(14) Tuition and fees means:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2029, for purposes of an elementary or secondary
school, the charges imposed for tuition in connection with enrollment or
attendance at such elementary or secondary school; and
(b) For purposes of an eligible postsecondary educational institution, the
quarter or semester charges imposed to attend an eligible postsecondary
educational institution.
-27-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
Sec. 42. Section 85-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1804 The Nebraska educational savings plan trust is created. The State
Treasurer is the trustee of the trust and as such is responsible for the
administration, operation, and maintenance of the program and has all powers
necessary to carry out and effectuate the purposes, objectives, and provisions
of sections 40 85-1801 to 55 of this act 85-1817 pertaining to the
administration, operation, and maintenance of the trust and program, except
that the state investment officer shall have fiduciary responsibility to make
all decisions regarding the investment of the money in the administrative fund,
expense fund, and program fund, including the selection of all investment
options and the approval of all fees and other costs charged to trust assets
except costs for administration, operation, and maintenance of the trust as
appropriated by the Legislature, pursuant to the directions, guidelines, and
policies established by the Nebraska Investment Council. The State Treasurer
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the efficient
administration, operation, and maintenance of the trust and program. The State
Treasurer shall not adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that in any way
interfere with the fiduciary responsibility of the state investment officer to
make all decisions regarding the investment of money in the administrative
fund, expense fund, and program fund. The State Treasurer or his or her
designee shall have the power to:
(1) Enter into agreements with any eligible postsecondary educational
institution, the state, any federal or other state agency, or any other entity
to implement sections 40 85-1801 to 55 of this act 85-1817, except agreements
which pertain to the investment of money in the administrative fund, expense
fund, or program fund;
(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, enter into agreements with any elementary
or secondary school to implement sections 40 to 55 of this act, except
agreements which pertain to the investment of money in the administrative fund,
expense fund, or program fund;
(3) (2) Carry out the duties and obligations of the trust;
(4) (3) Carry out studies and projections to advise participants regarding
present and estimated future qualified higher education expenses and levels of
financial participation in the trust required in order to enable participants
to achieve their educational funding objectives;
(5) (4) Participate in any federal, state, or local governmental program
for the benefit of the trust;
(6) (5) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the
property, assets, or activities of the trust as provided in section
81-8,239.01;
(7) (6) Enter into participation agreements with participants;
(8) (7) Make payments to elementary or secondary schools or eligible
postsecondary educational institutions pursuant to participation agreements on
behalf of beneficiaries and make qualified education loan payments on behalf of
beneficiaries or their siblings;
(9) (8) Make distributions to participants upon the termination of
participation agreements pursuant to the provisions, limitations, and
restrictions set forth in sections 40 85-1801 to 55 of this act 85-1817;
(10) (9) Contract for goods and services and engage personnel as
necessary, including consultants, actuaries, managers, legal counsels, and
auditors for the purpose of rendering professional, managerial, and technical
assistance and advice regarding trust administration and operation, except
contracts which pertain to the investment of the administrative, expense, or
program funds; and
(11) (10) Establish, impose, and collect administrative fees and charges
in connection with transactions of the trust, and provide for reasonable
service charges, including penalties for cancellations and late payments with
respect to participation agreements.
The Nebraska Investment Council may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to provide for the prudent investment of the assets of the trust.
The council or its designee also has the authority to select and enter into
agreements with individuals and entities to provide investment advice and
management of the assets held by the trust, establish investment guidelines,
objectives, and performance standards with respect to the assets held by the
trust, and approve any fees, commissions, and expenses, which directly or
indirectly affect the return on assets.
Sec. 43. Section 85-1805, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1805 Any advertising or promotional materials relating to the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust may include references to a public office but
shall not refer to an officeholder by name.
Sec. 44. Section 85-1806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1806 The Nebraska educational savings plan trust may enter into
participation agreements with participants on behalf of beneficiaries pursuant
to the following terms and conditions:
(1) A participation agreement shall authorize a participant to make
contributions to an account which is established for the purpose of meeting the
qualified higher education expenses of a beneficiary as allowed by section 529
of the Internal Revenue Code. A participant shall not be required to make an
annual contribution on behalf of a beneficiary, shall not be subject to minimum
contribution requirements, and shall not be required to maintain a minimum
-28-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
account balance. The maximum contribution shall not exceed the amount allowed
under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The State Treasurer may set a
maximum cumulative contribution, as necessary, to maintain compliance with
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. Participation agreements may be
amended to provide for adjusted levels of contributions based upon changed
circumstances or changes in educational plans or to ensure compliance with
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code or any other applicable laws and
regulations;
(2) Beneficiaries designated in participation agreements shall meet the
requirements established by the trustee and section 529 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(3) Payment of benefits provided under participation agreements shall be
made in a manner consistent with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(4) The execution of a participation agreement by the trust shall not
guarantee in any way that qualified higher education expenses will be equal to
projections and estimates provided by the trust or that the beneficiary named
in any participation agreement will (a) be admitted to an eligible
postsecondary educational institution, (b) if admitted, be determined a
resident for tuition purposes by the eligible postsecondary educational
institution, (c) be allowed to continue attendance at the eligible
postsecondary educational institution following admission, or (d) graduate from
the eligible postsecondary educational institution;
(5) Beginning January 1, 2029, the execution of a participation agreement
by the trust shall not guarantee in any way that qualified education expenses
will be equal to projections and estimates provided by the trust or that the
beneficiary named in any participation agreement will (a) be admitted to an
elementary or secondary school, (b) if admitted, be determined a resident for
tuition purposes by the elementary or secondary school, (c) be allowed to
continue attendance at the elementary or secondary school following admission,
or (d) graduate from the elementary or secondary school;
(6) (5) A beneficiary under a participation agreement may be changed as
permitted under the rules and regulations adopted under sections 40 85-1801 to
55 of this act 85-1817 and consistent with section 529 of the Internal Revenue
Code upon written request of the participant as long as the substitute
beneficiary is eligible for participation. Participation agreements may
otherwise be freely amended throughout their term in order to enable
participants to increase or decrease the level of participation, change the
designation of beneficiaries, and carry out similar matters as authorized by
rule and regulation; and
(7) (6) Each participation agreement shall provide that the participation
agreement may be canceled upon the terms and conditions and upon payment of
applicable fees and costs set forth and contained in the rules and regulations.
Sec. 45. Section 85-1807, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1807 (1) The State Treasurer shall deposit money received by the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust into three funds: The Education College
Savings Plan Program Fund, the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund, and
the Education College Savings Plan Administrative Fund. The State Treasurer
shall deposit money received by the trust into the appropriate fund. The State
Treasurer and Accounting Administrator of the Department of Administrative
Services shall determine the state fund types necessary to comply with section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code and state policy. The money in the funds shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to policies established by
the Nebraska Investment Council. The program fund, the expense fund, and the
administrative fund shall be separately administered. The Nebraska educational
savings plan trust shall be operated with no General Fund appropriations.
(2) The Education College Savings Plan Program Fund is created. All money
paid in connection with participation agreements and all investment income
earned on such money shall be deposited as received into separate accounts
within the program fund. Contributions to the trust may only be made in the
form of cash. All funds generated in connection with participation agreements
shall be deposited into the appropriate accounts within the program fund. A
participant or beneficiary shall not provide investment direction regarding
program contributions or earnings held by the trust. Until January 1, 2029,
money Money accrued in the program fund may be used for the benefit of a
beneficiary for payments to any eligible postsecondary educational institution,
but shall not be used to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten
through grade twelve. Beginning January 1, 2029, money accrued in the program
fund may be used for the benefit of a beneficiary for payments to any
elementary or secondary school or eligible postsecondary educational
institution. Any money in the program fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The Education College Savings Plan Administrative Fund is created.
Money from the trust transferred from the expense fund to the administrative
fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation from the Legislature shall be
utilized to pay for the costs of administering, operating, and maintaining the
trust, to the extent permitted by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The
administrative fund shall not be credited with any money other than money
transferred from the expense fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation
by the Legislature or any interest income earned on the balances held in the
administrative fund. Any money in the administrative fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
-29-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4)(a) The Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund is created. The
expense fund shall be funded with fees assessed to the program fund. The State
Treasurer shall use the expense fund:
(i) To pay costs associated with the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust; and
(ii) For the purposes described in the Meadowlark Act;
(iii) On or before September 1, 2020, to transfer from the expense fund to
the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund fifty-nine thousand five
hundred dollars to defray the costs incurred to implement Laws 2020, LB1042;
and
(iii) (iv) To transfer from the expense fund to the State Investment
Officer's Cash Fund an amount equal to the pro rata share of the budget
appropriated to the Nebraska Investment Council as permitted in section
72-1249.02, to cover reasonable expenses incurred for investment management of
the Nebraska educational savings plan trust. Annually and prior to such
transfer to the State Investment Officer's Cash Fund, the State Treasurer shall
report to the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services and
to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the amounts transferred during the previous
fiscal year. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be
submitted electronically.
(b) Any money in the expense fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 46. Section 85-1808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1808 (1) A participant may cancel a participation agreement at will by
submitting a request to terminate the participation agreement. Additionally, if
a participant requests and obtains a nonqualified withdrawal, the participation
agreement shall be deemed canceled with respect to the amount of the
nonqualified withdrawal. A participation agreement shall not be deemed canceled
if a participant requests and obtains a distribution of his or her entire
account balance for qualified higher education expenses and subsequently closes
his or her account. Furthermore, the State Treasurer shall have the power to
terminate, freeze, or suspend a participation agreement if he or she determines
that the participant provided false or misleading information to the detriment
of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, if the participant's account
has a zero balance, or if the State Treasurer is unable to verify the identity
of the participant.
(2) If a participation agreement is canceled for any of the causes listed
in this subsection, the participant shall be entitled to receive the principal
amount of all contributions made by the participant under the participation
agreement plus the actual program fund investment income earned on the
contributions, less any losses incurred on the investment, and such
distribution will generally not be subject to federal tax penalty:
(a) Death of the beneficiary if the distribution is paid to the estate of
the beneficiary or transferred to another beneficiary as set forth in
subsection (10) of section 47 of this act 85-1809;
(b) Permanent disability or mental incapacity of the beneficiary;
(c) The beneficiary is awarded a scholarship as defined in section 529 of
the Internal Revenue Code, but only to the extent the distribution of earnings
does not exceed the scholarship amount; or
(d) A qualified rollover is made as permitted by section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code, except that if a qualified rollover is made into a plan
sponsored by another state or entity, the participation agreement shall be
deemed to have been canceled for purposes of subdivision (8)(d) of section
77-2716 and federal adjusted gross income shall be increased to the extent
previously deducted as a contribution to the trust.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, under no
circumstances shall a participant or beneficiary receive a distribution that is
more than the fair market value of the specific account on the applicable
liquidation date.
(4) If a participant cancels a participation agreement, obtains a rollover
into a plan sponsored by another state or entity, or obtains a distribution, a
portion of which constitutes a nonqualified withdrawal, the amount of the
distribution, rollover, or withdrawal will be subject to recapture of previous
Nebraska state income tax deductions as set forth in subdivision (8)(d) of
section 77-2716. The transfer of assets among plans sponsored by the State of
Nebraska shall be considered an investment option change and not a rollover.
Sec. 47. Section 85-1809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1809 (1) A participant retains ownership of all contributions made
under a participation agreement up to the date of utilization for payment of
qualified higher education expenses for the beneficiary or, in the case of a
qualified education loan payment, for the beneficiary or a sibling of the
beneficiary. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any amount credited to
any account is not susceptible to any levy, execution, judgment, or other
operation of law, garnishment, or other judicial enforcement, and the amount is
not an asset or property of either the participant or the beneficiary for the
purposes of any state insolvency or inheritance tax laws. All income derived
from the investment of the contributions made by the participant shall be
considered to be held in trust for the benefit of the beneficiary.
(2) If the program created by sections 40 85-1801 to 55 of this act
-30-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
85-1817 is terminated prior to payment of qualified higher education expenses,
the participant is entitled to receive the fair market value of the account
established in the program.
(3) If the beneficiary graduates from an eligible postsecondary
educational institution and a balance remains in the participant's account, any
remaining funds may be used to make qualified education loan payments for
siblings of the beneficiary or transferred as allowed by rule or regulation,
subject to the provisions of section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, as well
as any other applicable state or federal laws or regulations.
(4)(a) (4) The eligible postsecondary educational institution shall obtain
ownership of the payments made for the qualified higher education expenses paid
to the institution at the time each payment is made to the institution.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2029, the elementary or secondary school shall
obtain ownership of the payments made for the qualified education expenses paid
to the school at the time each payment is made to the school.
(5) Any amounts which may be paid to any person or persons pursuant to the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust but which are not listed in this
section are owned by the trust.
(6) A participant may transfer ownership rights to another eligible
participant, including a gift of the ownership rights to a minor beneficiary.
The transfer shall be made and the property distributed in accordance with the
rules and regulations or with the terms of the participation agreement.
(7) A participant shall not be entitled to utilize any interest in the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust as security for a loan.
(8) The Nebraska educational savings plan trust may accept transfers of
cash investments from a custodian under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to
Minors Act or any other similar laws under the terms and conditions established
by the trustee.
(9) A participant may designate a successor account owner to succeed to
all of the participant's rights, title, and interest in an account, including
the right to change the account beneficiary, upon the death or legal incapacity
of the participant. If a participant dies or becomes legally incapacitated and
has failed to name a successor account owner, the account beneficiary shall
become the account owner.
(10) Upon the death of a beneficiary, the participant may change the
beneficiary on the account, transfer assets to another beneficiary who is a
member of the family of the former beneficiary, or request a nonqualified
withdrawal.
Sec. 48. Section 85-1810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1810 (1) A student loan program, student grant program, or other
program administered by any agency of the state, except as may be otherwise
provided by federal law or the provisions of any specific grant applicable to
the federal law, shall not take into account and shall not consider amounts
available for the payment of qualified higher education expenses pursuant to
the Nebraska educational savings plan trust in determining need and eligibility
for student aid.
(2) A government program administered by any agency of the state that
provides benefits or aid to individuals based on financial need, except as may
be otherwise provided by federal law or the provisions of any specific grant
applicable to the federal law, shall not take into account and shall not
consider contributions made to a participant's account by the participant's
employer in determining the income of such participant.
Sec. 49. Section 85-1811, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1811 (1) The State Treasurer shall submit an annual audited financial
report, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles,
on the operations of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust by November 1
to the Governor and the Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The State Treasurer shall cause the audit to
be made either by the Auditor of Public Accounts or by an independent certified
public accountant designated by the State Treasurer, and the audit shall
include direct and indirect costs attributable to the use of outside
consultants, independent contractors, and any other persons who are not state
employees.
(2) The annual audit shall be supplemented by all of the following
information prepared by the State Treasurer:
(a) Any related studies or evaluations prepared in the preceding year;
(b) A summary of the benefits provided by the trust, including the number
of participants and beneficiaries in the trust; and
(c) Any other information which is relevant in order to make a full, fair,
and effective disclosure of the operations of the trust, including the
investment performance of the funds.
Sec. 50. Section 85-1812, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1812 (1) For federal income tax purposes, the Nebraska educational
savings plan trust shall be considered a qualified state tuition program exempt
from taxation pursuant to section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The trust
meets the requirements of section 529(b) of the Internal Revenue Code as
follows:
(a) Pursuant to section 44 of this act 85-1806, a participant may make
contributions to an account which is established for the purpose of meeting the
qualified higher education expenses of the designated beneficiary of the
-31-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
account or, in the case of a qualified education loan payment, the designated
beneficiary of the account or a sibling of the designated beneficiary;
(b) Pursuant to section 44 of this act 85-1806, a maximum contribution
level is established;
(c) Pursuant to section 45 of this act 85-1807, a separate account is
established for each beneficiary;
(d) Pursuant to section 45 of this act 85-1807, contributions may only be
made in the form of cash;
(e) Pursuant to section 45 of this act 85-1807, a participant or
beneficiary shall not provide investment direction regarding program
contributions or earnings held by the trust;
(f) Penalties are provided on distributions of earnings which are: (i) Not
used for qualified higher education expenses of the beneficiary or, in the case
of a qualified education loan payment, the beneficiary or a sibling of the
beneficiary; (ii) made on account of the death of the designated beneficiary if
the distribution is not transferred to another beneficiary or paid to the
estate of the beneficiary; (iii) not made on account of the permanent
disability or mental incapacity of the designated beneficiary; or (iv) made due
to scholarship, allowance, or payment receipt in excess of the scholarship,
allowance, or payment receipt; and
(g) Pursuant to section 47 of this act 85-1809, a participant shall not
pledge any interest in the trust as security for a loan.
(2) State income tax treatment of the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust shall be as provided in section 77-2716.
(3) For purposes of federal gift and generation-skipping transfer taxes,
contributions to an account are considered a completed gift from the
contributor to the beneficiary.
Sec. 51. Section 85-1813, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1813 The assets of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust,
including the program fund and excluding the administrative fund and the
expense fund, shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended solely
and only for the purposes of the trust and shall be held in trust for the
participants and beneficiaries. No property rights in the trust shall exist in
favor of the state. Assets of the trust, including the program fund, the
administrative fund, and the expense fund, shall not be transferred or used by
the state for any purposes other than the purposes of the trust.
Sec. 52. Section 85-1814, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1814 Nothing in sections 40 85-1801 to 51 of this act 85-1813 shall be
deemed to prohibit both resident and nonresident participants and designated
beneficiaries from being eligible to participate in and benefit from the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust and program. It is the intent of the
Legislature that funds and income credited to the program fund are fully
portable and may be used at any eligible postsecondary educational institution
and beginning January 1, 2029, at any elementary or secondary school.
Sec. 53. Section 85-1815, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1815 (1) The College Savings Incentive Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the State Treasurer and shall be used to provide
incentive payments under the Employer Matching Contribution Incentive Program
established in section 54 of this act 85-1816 and to provide matching
scholarships under the College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship
Program established in section 55 of this act 85-1817. The State Treasurer
shall accept contributions from any private individual or private entity and
shall credit all such contributions received to the College Savings Incentive
Cash Fund for the purpose of providing an ongoing source of funding for the
College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program. The matching
contributions for which incentive payments are made under the Employer Matching
Contribution Incentive Program and the matching scholarships provided under the
College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program shall not be used
to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
(2) The College Savings Incentive Cash Fund shall not be considered an
asset of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 54. Section 85-1816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1816 (1) The Employer Matching Contribution Incentive Program is
created. The program shall begin on January 1, 2022, and shall be implemented
and administered by the State Treasurer. The purpose of the program is to
encourage employers to make matching contributions by providing incentive
payments for such contributions.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability company,
association, corporation, business trust, legal representative, or organized
group of persons employing one or more employees at any one time, but such term
does not include the United States, the state, or any political subdivision
thereof; and
(b) Matching contribution means a contribution made by an employer to an
account established under the Nebraska educational savings plan trust in an
amount matching all or part of a contribution made to that same account by an
-32-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
individual who resided in the State of Nebraska during the most recently
completed taxable year and is an employee of such employer.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2022, an employer shall be eligible to receive an
incentive payment under this section if the employer made matching
contributions during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(4) In order to receive an incentive payment under this section, an
employer shall submit an application to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed
by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall accept applications from
January 1 to June 1 of each year beginning in 2022. The application shall
include:
(a) The number of employees for whom matching contributions were made in
the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The amount of the matching contributions made in the immediately
preceding calendar year for each employee; and
(c) Any other information required by the State Treasurer.
(5) If the State Treasurer determines that the employer qualifies for an
incentive payment under this section, the State Treasurer shall approve the
application and shall notify the employer of the approval. The State Treasurer
may approve applications until the annual limit provided in subsection (6) of
this section has been reached. An employer whose application is approved shall
receive an incentive payment equal to twenty-five percent of the total matching
contributions made during the immediately preceding calendar year, not to
exceed two thousand dollars per contributing employee per year. An employer
shall not receive an incentive payment for a matching contribution if the
employer claimed an income tax deduction pursuant to subdivision (8)(b) of
section 77-2716 for such matching contribution. Employers shall be limited to
one incentive payment per beneficiary. The matching contributions for which
incentive payments are made shall not be used to pay expenses associated with
attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
(6) The State Treasurer may approve a total of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars of incentive payments each calendar year.
(7) On or before June 30, 2022, and on or before June 30 of each year
thereafter, the State Treasurer shall determine the total amount of incentive
payments approved for the year, shall transfer such amount from the Education
College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund, as
determined by the State Treasurer, to the College Savings Incentive Cash Fund,
and shall distribute such incentive payments to the approved employers.
(8) The State Treasurer may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Employer Matching Contribution Incentive Program.
Sec. 55. Section 85-1817, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1817 (1) Beginning January 1, 2022, there is hereby established the
College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program. The purpose of
the program is to encourage private contributions to accounts established under
the Nebraska educational savings plan trust for the benefit of individuals with
limited means. The State Treasurer shall implement and administer the program.
(2) A participant shall be eligible for the program if the beneficiary for
whom private contributions are made is part of a family whose household income
for the most recently completed taxable year is not more than two hundred fifty
percent of the federal poverty level and the beneficiary is a resident of the
State of Nebraska.
(3) Applications for participation in the program shall be submitted to
the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer. If the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met, the State Treasurer
shall approve the application and notify the applicant of the approval. The
State Treasurer may approve applications until the annual limit provided in
subsection (7) of this section has been reached.
(4) Any participant who is approved for the program under subsection (3)
of this section must resubmit an application each year thereafter and be
reapproved in order to continue participation in the program.
(5) If a participant is approved for the program, any contribution made by
such participant under the program shall be matched with scholarship funds
provided by the State of Nebraska. The matching scholarship shall be equal to:
(a) One hundred percent of the participant's contribution if the
beneficiary for whom the contribution is made is part of a family whose
household income for the most recently completed taxable year is more than two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level but not more than two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level, not to exceed one thousand dollars
annually; or
(b) Two hundred percent of the participant's contribution if the
beneficiary for whom the contribution is made is part of a family whose
household income for the most recently completed taxable year is not more than
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, not to exceed one thousand
dollars annually.
(6) Between January 1 and January 31 of each year, the State Treasurer
shall transfer the amount necessary to meet the matching obligations of this
section for the preceding calendar year, minus the amount of any private
contributions received pursuant to subsection (1) of section 53 of this act
85-1815 during the preceding calendar year, from the Education College Savings
Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund, as determined by the
State Treasurer, to the College Savings Incentive Cash Fund. The State
Treasurer shall transfer from the College Savings Incentive Cash Fund to the
Education College Savings Plan Program Fund the amount necessary to meet the
-33-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
matching obligations of this section for the preceding calendar year. The
Nebraska educational savings plan trust shall own all scholarships awarded
under this section. Neither the participant nor the beneficiary shall have any
ownership rights to or interest in, title to, or power or control over such
scholarships. Scholarship funds disbursed shall only be used to pay the
qualified higher education expenses associated with attending an eligible
postsecondary educational institution located in this state and shall not be
used to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through grade
twelve. Any disbursement of such scholarships shall be made before the
beneficiary reaches thirty years of age. Once the beneficiary reaches thirty
years of age, any unused scholarship funds shall be transferred to the
Meadowlark Endowment Fund.
(7) The State Treasurer may approve a total of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars of scholarships each calendar year under the College Savings Plan Low-
Income Matching Scholarship Program.
Sec. 56. Section 85-2802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2802 For purposes of the Meadowlark Act:
(1) Contribution means a donation which is made for the purpose of
providing a source of funding for the Meadowlark Program established in section
85-2804;
(2) Eligible postsecondary educational institution has the same meaning as
in section 41 of this act 85-1802;
(3) Nebraska educational savings plan trust has the same meaning as in
section 41 of this act 85-1802;
(4) Qualified higher education expenses has the same meaning as in section
41 of this act 85-1802; and
(5) Qualified individual means an individual born on or after January 1,
2020, who is a resident of this state at the time of birth.
Sec. 57. Section 85-2803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2803 (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury a trust fund
to be known as the Meadowlark Endowment Fund. The fund shall be administered by
the State Treasurer and shall consist of qualified private contributions and
any amounts appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislature. No
General Funds shall be transferred to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund. Any money
in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. No portion of the principal of the fund shall be expended
for any purpose except investment pursuant to this subsection.
(2) The State Treasurer may accept contributions and shall credit all such
contributions received either to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund or to accounts
opened under the Meadowlark Program, at the direction of the donor. Such
contributions shall not be used to pay expenses associated with attending
kindergarten through grade twelve.
(3) On or before April 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall determine
the total amount of contributions received under subsection (2) of this section
in the previous calendar year and shall transfer an equal amount from the
Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property Trust
Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund or
to accounts opened under the Meadowlark Program. For any amount transferred
from the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property
Trust Fund that is not being transferred to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund, the
State Treasurer shall evenly distribute such amount to the accounts opened
under the Meadowlark Program in the previous calendar year.
Sec. 58. Section 85-2804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2804 (1) The Meadowlark Program is created. The program shall be
administered by the State Treasurer. The purpose of the program is to promote
access to postsecondary educational opportunities by providing funds to
qualified individuals to help pay the qualified higher education expenses
associated with attendance at an eligible postsecondary educational institution
located in this state.
(2) Any qualified individual shall be eligible to participate in the
Meadowlark Program. No later than March 1 of each year, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall transmit information to the State Treasurer
which is necessary to administer the program and to establish whether the
children born in the previous calendar year are qualified individuals. Such
information shall include, but not be limited to, the full name and residential
address of each child's parent or legal guardian and the birthdate of each
child. Costs associated with the transfer of information by the Department of
Health and Human Services shall be paid from the Education College Savings Plan
Expense Fund.
(3) Following receipt of the information described in subsection (2) of
this section, the State Treasurer shall send a notification explaining the
Meadowlark Program to the parent or legal guardian of each qualified
individual. The State Treasurer shall provide such parent or legal guardian
with the opportunity to exclude his or her child from the program. Any child
who is not excluded shall be deemed to be enrolled in the program. Upon
enrollment into the program, the child shall have an account opened for him or
her under the Nebraska educational savings plan trust.
(4) On or before April 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall determine
(a) the number of accounts opened under the Meadowlark Program in the previous
-34-

LB647 LB647
2025 2025
calendar year and (b) the amount of investment income generated by the
Meadowlark Endowment Fund in the previous calendar year. The State Treasurer
shall evenly distribute the investment income from the previous calendar year
to the accounts opened in the previous calendar year.
(5) The Nebraska educational savings plan trust shall own all accounts
opened under the Meadowlark Program. Neither the qualified individual nor his
or her parent or legal guardian shall have any ownership rights or interest in,
title to, or power or control over such an account.
(6) Any disbursement from an account opened under the Meadowlark Program
shall be made before the qualified individual reaches thirty years of age. Once
a qualified individual reaches thirty years of age, any unused funds in his or
her account shall be transferred to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund.
(7) Funds disbursed from an account opened under the Meadowlark Program
shall only be used to pay the qualified higher education expenses associated
with attending an eligible postsecondary educational institution located in
this state and shall not be used to pay expenses associated with attending
kindergarten through grade twelve.
(8) The State Treasurer shall take measures to ensure the security and
confidentiality of the information received under subsection (2) of this
section.
Sec. 59. Sections 23, 24, 30, 35, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49,
50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, and 62 of this act become operative on
October 1, 2025. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 31, and 63 of
this act become operative on January 1, 2026. Sections 7, 8, 9, 11, 12, 34, 36,
37, 38, and 61 of this act become operative three calendar months after the
adjournment of this legislative session. The other sections of this act become
operative on their effective date.
Sec. 60. Original sections 14-109, 15-202, 15-203, 16-205, and 17-525,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 13-518, 13-3402, 13-3403,
13-3405, 13-3406, 18-1208, 77-1631, 77-1701, and 77-7305, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 61. Original section 13-3106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 13-3103, 77-2715.07, 77-2727, 77-2734.01, and 77-2776, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 62. Original sections 85-1801, 85-1802, 85-1804, 85-1805, 85-1806,
85-1807, 85-1808, 85-1809, 85-1810, 85-1811, 85-1812, 85-1813, 85-1814,
85-1815, 85-1816, 85-1817, 85-2802, 85-2803, and 85-2804, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 68-1201, 72-1239.01, 77-3,110, and 77-2716,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 63. Original section 77-1613, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 76-214, 77-202, 77-202.01, 77-202.03, and 77-202.05, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 64. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-35-